Delaware, session 153, SB200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE (Three-fourths of all members
elected to each house thereof concurring therein):
Section 1. Fiscal Year 2025 2026 Capital Improvements Project Schedule Addendum. The General
Assembly hereby authorizes the following projects in the following amounts for the purposes set forth in this Section and as
described in the Fiscal Year 2025 2026 Governor’s Recommended Capital Budget and Project Information document. Any
authorization balance (excluding Transportation Trust Fund balances) remaining unexpended or unencumbered by June 30,
2027 2028, shall be subject to reversion or reauthorization.
CG: RAM: VLB
0211530009 Page 1 of 81

MUDNEDDA

NOITCES
ELUDEHCS
TCEJORP
LATIPAC
6202
RAEY
LACSIF
LANRETNI
NOITATROPSNART
SNOITAZIROHTUAER
DNOB
MARGORP
LATOT
SDNUF
LARENEG
SDNUF
TSURT
GNIMMARGORPER
DNA
NOITAZIROHTUA
TINU
TCEJORP/YCNEGA
TEGDUB
DNA TNEMEGANAM
FO ECIFFO20-01
000,057
$
000,057
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
11-20-01
sretneC
ecitsuJ ylimaF
000,000,05
000,000,05
-
-
-
11-20-01
noitargiM
duolC PRE
000,000,02
000,000,02
-
-
-
11-20-01
dnuF tnemtsevnieR
ytinummoC
000,573
000,573
-
-
-
11-20-01
ecivreS
ytiruceS rebyC
000,051
000,041
-
000,01
-
05-20-01
lavomeR
reirraB
larutcetihcrA
000,000,7
-
-
000,000,1
000,000,6
05-20-01
noitarotseR
dna
ecnanetniaM
gnidliuB
eciffO
etatS levraC
000,000,7
-
-
-
000,000,7
05-20-01
ytilicaF
xessuS
- robaL
fo tnemtrapeD
000,000,91
-
-
-
000,000,91
05-20-01
noitavoneR
llessiB .P ylimE
000,005,1
000,005,1
-
-
-
05-20-01
)rehtO/sotsebsA/TSU(
ecnailpmoC
latnemnorivnE
000,005
000,005
-
-
-
05-20-01
tnempiuqE
dna
stnemevorpmI
latipaC
roniM
llaH evitalsigeL
000,008,1
-
-
-
000,008,1
05-20-01
stnemevorpmI
retneC ecitsuJ
smailliW
.L dranoeL
000,000,01
049,835,7
-
060,164
000,000,2
05-20-01
tnempiuqE
dna tnemevorpmI
latipaC roniM
000,005,3
-
-
-
000,005,3
05-20-01
tneK
noitavoneR
esuohtruoC
ylimaF
dlO
000,005,3
-
-
-
000,005,3
05-20-01
xessuS
noitavoneR
esuohtruoC
ylimaF
dlO
000,000,4
-
-
-
000,000,4
05-20-01
noitavoneR
nwotegroeG
- 4 poorT
dlO
000,000,1
-
-
-
000,000,1
05-20-01
ecapS
yrotarobaL
noitavoneR
- gnidliuB snibboR
dna nosdrahciR
000,000,5
-
-
-
000,000,5
05-20-01
stnemecalpeR
fooR
000,003,5
000,003,5
-
-
-
05-20-01
ecnanetniaM
derrefeD
ediwetatS
000,004
000,004
-
-
-
05-20-01
tnemesaE
xamoR/ocniwT stcejorP laiciduJ

000,000,4
-
-
-
000,000,4
05-20-01
nwotelddiM

dna
anrymS

struoC
ecaeP
eht fo ecitsuJ
rof ytilicaF
denibmoC
000,000,3
-
-
-
000,000,3
05-20-01
esuoH smotsuC
260,119
262,628
-
008,48
-
05-20-01
tnempiuqE
dna tnemevorpmI
latipaC roniM
000,000,1
-
-
-
000,000,1
05-20-01
drofaeS

truoC
ecaeP
eht fo ecitsuJ
fo
noitarugifnoceR tcejorP lageL

000,005,3
-
-
-
000,005,3
05-20-01
elcriC
ehT 81 - snoitavoneR
nwotegroeG stcejorP etatS

000,003
000,003
-
-
-
05-20-01
nrubdooW
- moorhtaB
elbisseccA ADA
000,002
000,002
-
-
-
05-20-01
emoH
snareteV
- tnempiuqE
dna tnemevorpmI
latipaC roniM
000,571
000,571
-
-
-
05-20-01
draytruoC
emoH snareteV
000,005,2
-
-
-
000,005,2
05-20-01
stinU
poT fooR dna
fooR
emoH snareteV
stcejorP secivreS
laicoS
dna htlaeH

000,005,2
-
-
-
000,005,2
05-20-01
II
esahP
-
tnemecalpeR
metsyS
ytiruceS
gnidliuB
llehctiM supmaC
yawolloH
namreH
000,059,5
000,059,5
-
-
-
05-20-01
tnempiuqE
dna tnemevorpmI
latipaC roniM
000,005,4
-
-
-
000,005,4
05-20-01
stnemecalpeR
fooR
000,000,1
-
-
-
000,000,1
05-20-01
retneC
ecivreS
etatS leruaL
1-A

MUDNEDDA

NOITCES
ELUDEHCS
TCEJORP
LATIPAC
6202
RAEY
LACSIF
LANRETNI
NOITATROPSNART
SNOITAZIROHTUAER
DNOB
MARGORP
LATOT
SDNUF
LARENEG
SDNUF
TSURT
GNIMMARGORPER
DNA
NOITAZIROHTUA
TINU
TCEJORP/YCNEGA
stcejorP
seilimaF
riehT
dna
htuoY
,nerdlihC
rof secivreS

000,000,1
000,000,1
-
-
-
05-20-01
tnempiuqE
dna
tnemevorpmI
latipaC
roniM
000,007,1
-
-
-
000,007,1
05-20-01
stnemecalpeR
fooR
eraC
eruceS
000,000,6
-
-
-
000,000,6
05-20-01
noitavoneR
6-C
gnidliuB
yelkcotS
stcejorP
noitcerroC

000,057,6
000,052,4
-
000,005,2
-
05-20-01
)ICS
dna
CCVTJ
,ICWB
,ICYRH(
stnemecalpeR
rotareneG
ycnegremE
dna
hctiwS
refsnarT
citamotuA
000,006,8
-
-
-
000,006,8
05-20-01
noisnapxE
yramrifnI
)ICWB(
noitutitsnI
lanoitcerroC
s'nemoW
rolyaB
065,688,5
-
-
065,688,5
-
05-20-01
stnemecalpeR
CAVH
gnidliuB
noitartsinimdA
CCCP
dna
poT
fooR
yramrifnI
CCVTJ
,ediS
tseW
ICYRH
000,007,1
-
-
643,864,1
456,132
05-20-01
tnemecalpeR
fooR
gnidliuB
CCVTJ
000,000,2
-
-
000,000,2
-
05-20-01
tcejorP
CAVH
CCVTJ
000,002,1
-
-
-
000,002,1
05-20-01
gnifoorP
rehtaeW
dna riapeR
lennuT
ytiruceS
CCVTJ
000,000,5
000,000,5
-
-
-
05-20-01
tnempiuqE
dna
tnemevorpmI
latipaC
roniM
stcejorP
ytiruceS
dnalemoH
dna
ytefaS

009,752
009,752
-
-
-
11-20-01
tnemecalpeR
potpaL
tnemecrofnE
waL
lacoL
000,000,1
-
-
-
000,000,1
05-20-01
tnemecalpeR
rewoT
dna
retlehS
zHM
008
000,005,2
-
-
-
000,005,2
05-20-01
ecnanetniaM
ytilicaF
AMED
000,005,1
-
-
-
000,005,1
05-20-01
noitavoneR
pohS
oidaR
mmoCviD
000,007
000,007
-
-
-
05-20-01
tnempiuqE
dna
tnemevorpmI
latipaC
roniM
tcejorP
erutlucirgA

000,002
000,002
-
-
-
05-20-01
tnempiuqE
dna
tnemevorpmI
latipaC
roniM
tcejorP
loohcS
eriF
etatS

000,057
-
-
-
000,057
05-20-01
noisiviD
eltsaC
weN
- nraB
eloP
tcejorP
drauG
lanoitaN
erawaleD

000,003,2
000,003,2
-
-
-
05-20-01
tnempiuqE
dna
tnemevorpmI
latipaC
roniM
225,553,912
$
201,366,701
$
-
$
667,014,31
$
456,182,89
$
latotbuS
YTIROHTUA
GNISUOH
ETATS
ERAWALED80-01
000,000,5
$
000,000,5
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
10-80-01
margorP
gnisuoH
ecrofkroW
erawaleD
000,000,91
000,000,91
-
-
-
10-80-01
margorP
gnisuoH
latneR
elbadroffA
-
dnuF
tnempoleveD
gnisuoH
000,000,4
000,000,4
-
-
-
10-80-01
dnuF
gnisuoH
sdoohrobhgieN
gnortS
000,000,01
000,000,01
-
-
-
10-80-01
tnempolevedeR
nabrU
000,000,83
$
000,000,83
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
latotbuS
2-A

MUDNEDDA

NOITCES
ELUDEHCS
TCEJORP
LATIPAC
6202
RAEY
LACSIF
LANRETNI
NOITATROPSNART
SNOITAZIROHTUAER
DNOB
MARGORP
LATOT
SDNUF
LARENEG
SDNUF
TSURT
GNIMMARGORPER
DNA
NOITAZIROHTUA
TINU
TCEJORP/YCNEGA ETATS02
000,005
$
-
$
-
$
004,04
$
006,954
$
10-60-02
ecnanetniaM
muesuM
000,051
-
-
-
000,051
10-80-02
yrarbiL
wogsalG
927,811
-
-
-
927,811
10-80-02
yrarbiL
cilbuP
seweL
558,226
-
-
-
558,226
10-80-02
yrarbiL
cilbuP
drofliM
000,002
-
-
-
000,002
10-80-02
yrarbiL
eerF
kraweN
000,521
-
-
-
000,521
10-80-02
yrarbiL
etutitsnI
notgnimliW
000,000,1
000,869
-
000,23
-
10-01-02
)TAC(
ygolonhceT
decnavdA
rof retneC
ecneicsoiB
000,000,5
000,000,5
-
-
-
10-01-02
pihsrentraP
revoD
nwotnwoD
000,004,8
000,004,8
-
-
-
10-01-02
sevitaitinI
latipaC
- notgnimliW
fo
ytiC
000,006
000,006
-
-
-
10-01-02
mooR
gniniD
leunammE
- notgnimliW
fo
ytiC
000,000,5
000,000,5
-
-
-
10-01-02
knaB
dnaL
- notgnimliW
fo
ytiC
000,000,1
000,000,1
-
-
-
10-01-02
retneC
ytinummoC
nosrednA
"skciH"
mailliW
- notgnimliW
fo
ytiC
000,005,1
000,005,1
-
-
-
10-01-02
)RTC(
hcraeseR
lanoitalsnarT
dna lacinilC
erawaleD
000,053,2
194,843,2
-
905,1
-
10-01-02
pihsrentraP
ytirepsorP
erawaleD
000,000,01
000,000,01
-
-
-
10-01-02
dnuF
tnemtsevnI
latipaC
msiruoT
stropS
erawaleD
000,000,5
000,000,5
-
-
-
10-01-02
dnuF
cigetartS
erawaleD
000,008
-
-
000,008
-
10-01-02
tnemevorpmI
erutcurtsarfnI
hcraeseR
-
hcraeseR
evititepmoC
etalumitS
ot
margorP
latnemirepxE )IIR-ROCSPE(
000,000,2
000,000,2
-
-
-
10-01-02
)ERBNI(
ecnellecxE
hcraeseR
lacidemoiB
rof
krowteN
AeDI
000,000,5
000,000,5
-
-
-
10-01-02
ecapS
yrotarobaL
000,000,5
000,000,5
-
-
-
10-01-02
)LBMIIN(
slacituecamrahpoiB
gnirutcafunaM
ni noitavonnI
rof etutitsnI
lanoitaN
000,057,9
000,057,9
-
-
-
10-01-02
noitaroproC
tnempoleveD
tnorfreviR
000,000,01
000,000,01
-
-
-
10-01-02
dnuF
ssenidaeR
etiS
322,168,32
322,168,32
-
-
-
10-01-02
tnemeganaM
tnemevaP
teertS
noisividbuS
000,000,5
000,020,4
-
000,089
-
10-01-02
dnuF
tnemtsevnI
erutcurtsarfnI
noitatropsnarT
708,779,201
$
417,744,99
$
-
$
909,358,1
$
481,676,1
$
latotbuS
SECIVRES
LAICOS
DNA
HTLAEH53
000,331,1
$
000,331,1
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
02-10-53
)SNAS(
krowteN
sseccA
egarotS
noitcudorp-noN
dna
noitcudorP
000,005,7
698,254,7
-
401,74
-
03-10-53
noitarotseR
dna
ecnanetniaM
002,925,5
002,925,5
-
-
-
02-50-53
dnuF
gnivloveR
etatS
retaW
gniknirD
005,259,1
$
005,259,1
$
-
-
-
01-60-53
metsyS
gnilliB
sdroceR
htlaeH
cinortcelE
007,411,61
$
695,760,61
$
-
$
401,74
$
-
$
latotbuS
3-A

MUDNEDDA

NOITCES
ELUDEHCS
TCEJORP
LATIPAC
6202
RAEY
LACSIF
LANRETNI
NOITATROPSNART
SNOITAZIROHTUAER
DNOB
MARGORP
LATOT
SDNUF
LARENEG
SDNUF
TSURT
GNIMMARGORPER
DNA
NOITAZIROHTUA
TINU
TCEJORP/YCNEGA
SEILIMAF
RIEHT
DNA
HTUOY
,NERDLIHC
ROF SECIVRES73
000,002
$
000,002
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
51-10-73
noitarotseR
dna ecnanetniaM
000,002
$
000,002
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
latotbuS
NOITCERROC83
061,851,6
$
-
$
-
$
061,851,6
$
-
$
04-40-83
tnempiuqE
aremaC
ytiruceS
V dna VI
leveL
000,000,5
000,000,5
-
-
-
04-40-83
noitarotseR
dna ecnanetniaM
061,851,11
$
000,000,5
$
-
$
061,851,6
$
-
$
latotbuS
LORTNOC
LATNEMNORIVNE
DNA
SECRUOSER
LARUTAN04
000,005
$
000,005
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
10-10-04
evitaitinI
erohsyaB erawaleD
000,000,1
000,000,1
-
-
-
10-10-04
tnempiuqE
dna tnemevorpmI
latipaC
roniM
004,436,7
004,436,7
-
-
-
60-10-04
dnuF
gnivloveR
etatS retaW
naelC
772,672,31
772,672,31
-
-
-
20-30-04
erutcurtsarfnI
lanoitaerceR
cilbuP
dna
baheR ytilicaF
kraP
000,000,3
000,000,3
-
-
-
20-30-04
)tnoPuD
troF(
setiS
cigetartS
fo tnempolevedeR
000,000,3
000,000,3
-
-
-
20-30-04
syawhtaP
dna sliarT ediwetatS
000,002,3
000,002,3
-
-
-
40-30-04
erahS
tsoC noitavresnoC
000,52
000,52
-
-
-
40-30-04
)PERC(
margorP
tnemecnahnE
evreseR
noitavresnoC
000,000,1
000,000,1
-
-
-
40-30-04
stiP
sirbeD
000,000,1
000,000,1
-
-
-
40-30-04
smaD/sekiD
000,000,01
000,000,01
-
-
-
40-30-04
tnempoleveD
dna
noitavresnoC
,ecruoseR
000,000,01
000,000,01
-
-
-
40-30-04
tnemeganaM
yawretaW
dna enilerohS
007,841,2
007,841,2
-
-
-
40-30-04
sehctiD
xaT
000,052
000,052
-
-
-
20-40-04
gnirotinoM
ytilauQ
riA ytinummoC
000,052
000,052
-
-
-
30-40-04
krowteN
gnirotinoM
retawdnuorG
ediwetatS
000,000,3
000,000,3
-
-
-
40-40-04
sdleifnworB
773,482,95
$
773,482,95
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
latotbuS
YTIRUCES
DNALEMOH
DNA YTEFAS54
000,000,1
$
000,000,1
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
10-10-54
)ytnuoC
eltsaC
weN( ytilicaF
COVE
000,000,1
$
000,000,1
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
latotbuS
ERUTLUCIRGA56
000,000,1
$
000,000,1
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
10-10-56
yrehctaH
retsyO - erutlucauqA
000,052
000,052
-
-
-
10-10-56
snoitarepO
rof
tnempiuqE
lacitirC
000,004,6
000,004,6
-
-
-
21-10-56
tnemtsevnI
porC
revoC
000,056,7
$
000,056,7
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
latotbuS
LOOHCS
ERIF57
005,241
$
005,241
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
10-20-57
tnemecalpeR
slooT
eucseR ciluardyH
005,241
$
005,241
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
latotbuS
4-A

MUDNEDDA

NOITCES
ELUDEHCS
TCEJORP
LATIPAC
6202
RAEY
LACSIF
LANRETNI
NOITATROPSNART
SNOITAZIROHTUAER
DNOB
MARGORP
LATOT
SDNUF
LARENEG
SDNUF
TSURT
GNIMMARGORPER
DNA
NOITAZIROHTUA
TINU
TCEJORP/YCNEGA DRAUG LANOITAN ERAWALED67
582,015
$
-
$
-
$
582,015
$
-
$
10-10-67
etiS gniniarT hcaeB
ynahteB
000,058,3
-
-
-
000,058,3
10-10-67
noitcurtsnoC/perP
etiS/ngiseD
- retneC ssenidaeR dlowsehC
000,005,1
-
-
-
000,005,1
10-10-67
noisnapxE )TSC( maeT troppuS
liviC
000,528
-
-
000,528
-
10-10-67
retneC ssenidaeR orobsgaD
000,002
000,002
-
-
-
10-10-67
noitarotseR dna ecnanetniaM
000,005
-
-
000,005
-
10-10-67
tnempiuqE
dna tnemevorpmI latipaC
roniM
000,002
-
-
000,002
-
10-10-67
yaW
snneP
582,585,7
$
000,002
$
-
$
582,530,2
$
000,053,5
$
latotbuS
ERAWALED FO YTISREVINU10-09
000,000,03
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
000,000,03
$
10-10-09
stnemevorpmI
supmaC / ecnanetniaM
derrefeD
000,000,03
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
000,000,03
$
latotbuS
YTISREVINU ETATS ERAWALED30-09
000,000,03
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
000,000,03
$
10-30-09
ecnanetniaM
derrefeD / stnemevorpmI
supmaC
000,000,03
$
-
$
-
$
-
$
000,000,03
$
latotbuS
EGELLOC
YTINUMMOC LACINHCET ERAWALED40-09
000,000,03
$
670,983,1
$
-
$
-
$
429,016,82
$
10-40-09
ecnanetniaM
derrefeD / sdeeN latipaC
lacitirC
000,000,03
$
670,983,1
$
-
$
-
$
429,016,82
$
latotbuS
NOITACUDE59
000,061
$
102,201
$
-
$
997,75
$
-
$
10-10-59
lavomeR reirraB larutcetihcrA
000,000,51
374,550,8
-
725,449,6
-
10-10-59
tnempiuqE
dna tnemevorpmI latipaC
roniM
000,000,51
000,000,51
-
-
-
10-10-59
tnemevorpmI latipaC roniM decnahnE
000,831,9
000,831,9
-
-
-
10-10-59
ytiruceS dna ytefaS
loohcS
004,650,6
-
-
-
004,650,6
00-42-59
)32/77(
noitiddA etaidemretnI notyalC
,anrymS
002,114,8
-
-
-
002,114,8
00-42-59
)32/77(
noitavoneR/noitiddA
SE anrymS htroN
,anrymS
859,834,81
-
-
-
859,834,81
00-92-59
)32/77(
supmaC
timmuS ta SH/SM weN ,kniminiuqoppA
860,812,4
-
-
-
860,812,4
00-23-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR SM tnoPud IA ,yalC
deR
702,226,5
-
-
-
702,226,5
00-23-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR
loohcS sgnirpS eniwydnarB ,yalC
deR
000,006
-
-
-
000,006
00-23-59
)04/06(
gnidliuB ecnanetniaM suB ,yalC
deR
781,560,1
-
-
-
781,560,1
00-23-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR
ecneicS fo sloohcS darnoC ,yalC
deR
082,470,8
-
-
-
082,470,8
00-23-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR SH nosnikciD ,yalC
deR
781,315
-
-
-
781,315
00-23-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR SE kaO tseroF ,yalC
deR
965,637,3
-
-
-
965,637,3
00-23-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR SE nosnhoJ ,yalC
deR
866,123,5
-
-
-
866,123,5
00-23-59
)04/06( snoitavoneR SE siweL ,yalC
deR
945,035
-
-
-
945,035
00-23-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR SE lliH nedniL ,yalC
deR
147,240,31
-
-
-
147,240,31
00-23-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR SH naeKcM ,yalC
deR
128,915,7
-
-
-
128,915,7
00-23-59
)04/06( snoitavoneR SE etoM ,yalC
deR
5-A

MUDNEDDA

NOITCES
ELUDEHCS
TCEJORP
LATIPAC
6202
RAEY
LACSIF
LANRETNI
NOITATROPSNART
SNOITAZIROHTUAER
DNOB
MARGORP
LATOT
SDNUF
LARENEG
SDNUF
TSURT
GNIMMARGORPER
DNA
NOITAZIROHTUA
TINU
TCEJORP/YCNEGA
864,185
-
-
-
864,185
00-23-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR
SE
kraP
nosdrahciR
,yalC
deR
449,515
-
-
-
449,515
00-23-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR
SM
enilykS
,yalC
deR
687,527,9
-
-
-
687,527,9
00-23-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR
SM
notnatS
,yalC
deR
340,858
-
-
-
340,858
00-23-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR
SE
renraW
,yalC
deR
940,542,2
-
-
-
940,542,2
00-43-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR
SM
drofdeB
gninnuG
,lainoloC
971,383
-
-
-
971,383
00-43-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR
SM
hguolluCcM
,lainoloC
332,246,5
-
-
-
332,246,5
00-43-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR
SE
eltsaC
weN
,lainoloC
008,594,73
-
-
395,876,62
702,718,01
00-43-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR
SH
nneP
mailliW
,lainoloC
870,722
-
-
-
870,722
00-43-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR
SE
ronaM
notgnimliW
,lainoloC
275,777,61
-
-
-
275,777,61
00-83-59
)83/26(
tnemecalpeR
nosgdoH
.M
luaP
,TVCCN
009,896,01
-
-
-
009,896,01
00-04-59
)04/06(
SH
hceT
xessuS
weN
,hceT
xessuS
610,807,1
-
-
649,22
070,586,1
00-15-59
)etatS
%001(
snoitavoneR
faeD
eht
rof
loohcS
erawaleD
,anitsirhC
478,719,1
-
-
-
478,719,1
00-45-59
)04/06(
snoitavoneR
loohcS
doowodaeM
,yalC
deR
777,522,112
$
476,592,23
$
-
$
568,307,33
$
832,622,541
$
latotbuS
821,496,467
$
930,043,863
$
-
$
880,902,75
$
000,541,933
$
NOITATROPSNART-NON
LATOTBUS
NOITATROPSNART
FO TNEMTRAPED55
787,762,841
$
-
$
787,762,841
$
-
$
-
$
00-50-55
metsyS
daoR
000,086,83
-
000,086,83
-
-
00-50-55
snoitacollA
dna
stnarG
872,990,5
-
872,990,5
-
-
00-50-55
metsyS
tisnarT
893,965,02
-
893,965,02
-
-
00-50-55
metsyS
troppuS
364,616,212
$
-
$
364,616,212
$
-
$
-
$
latotbuS
195,013,779
$
930,043,863
$
364,616,212
$
880,902,75
$
000,541,933
$
LATOT
DNARG
6-A

Section 2. Authorization of Twenty-Year Bonds. The State hereby authorizes the issuance of bonds, to
which the State shall pledge its full faith and credit, such bonds to be issued in such principal amount as necessary to
provide proceeds to the State in the amount of $317,480,000 $339,145,000 and in the amount of $90,357,205
$87,115,316 local share of school bonds, at the discretion of the school district. Bonds authorized to be used by this
Section shall mature not later than 20 years from their date of issuance. The proceeds of such bonds, except for local
share of school bonds, are hereby appropriated for a portion of the purposes set forth in Section 1 Addendum of this
Act and summarized as follows:
Department, Agency or Instrumentality Amount
Office of Management and Budget $125,808,600 $98,281,654
Department of State 7,946,417 1,676,184
Department of Health and Social Services 4,750,000
Department of Agriculture 200,000
Delaware National Guard 791,875 5,350,000
University of Delaware 30,000,000
Delaware State University 30,000,000
Delaware Technical Community College 28,610,924
Education $177,983,108 145,226,238
Maximum
Purpose State Share Local Share Total Cost
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 18,176,150 8,648,415 26,824,565
Smyrna, Clayton Intermediate Addition (77/23) 11,769,900 5,324,700 17,094,600
Smyrna, New 600 Student E/S (77/23) 6,800,600 2,031,400 8,832,000
Smyrna, North Smyrna ES Addition/Renovation (77/23) 16,359,500 7,399,000 23,758,500
Appoquinimink, New MS and HS at Summit
Campus (100% Local) 10,000,000 10,000,000
Red Clay, AI duPont MS Renovations (60/40) 349,322 232,882 582,204
Red Clay, Brandywine Springs School Renovations (60/40) 465,607 310,405 776,012
Red Clay, Dickinson HS Renovations (60/40) 668,677 445,785 1,114,462
Red Clay, Heritage ES Renovations (60/40) 3,418,310 2,278,873 5,697,183
Red Clay, Johnson ES Renovations (60/40) 309,447 206,298 515,745


Red Clay, Lewis ES Renovations (60/40) 440,718 293,812 734,530
Red Clay, McKean HS Renovations (60/40) 1,080,144 720,096 1,800,240
Red Clay, Mote ES Renovations (60/40) 622,760 415,173 1,037,933
Red Clay, Stanton MS Renovations (60/40) 805,449 536,965 1,342,414
Colonial, Eisenberg ES Renovations (60/40) 421,923 281,282 703,205
Colonial, Gunning Bedford MS Renovations (60/40) 653,191 435,461 1,088,652
Colonial, William Penn HS Renovations (60/40) 3,105,242 2,070,162 5,175,404
NCCVT, Howard HS Stadium Planning and Design (60/40) 666,667 666,667
NCCVT, Paul M. Hodgson Replacement (62/38) 33,599,895 20,520,618 54,120,513
NCCVT, Paul M. Hodgson Vocational Technical
High School Field House (100% Local) 3,599,138 3,599,138
Polytech, Polytech HS Roof Replacement (79/21) 2,499,224 664,351 3,163,575
Polytech, Polytech HS Walkway Enclosure (79/21) 453,873 120,650 574,523
Sussex Tech, New Sussex Tech HS (60/40) 34,236,300 22,824,216 57,060,516
Christina, Delaware School for the
Deaf Renovations (100% State) 3,795,593 3,795,593
Colonial, New Leach School (100% State) 37,455,000 37,455,000
Red Clay, Meadowood School Extended
Renovations (60/40) 337,453 224,969 562,422
Red Clay, Meadowood School Renovations (60/40) 158,830 105,887 264,717
Subtotal 177,983,108 90,357,205 268,340,313
TOTAL $317,480,000
Maximum
Purpose State Share Local Share Total Cost
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 7,023,684 7,023,684
Smyrna, Clayton Intermediate Addition (77/23) 6,056,400 1,809,000 7,865,400
Smyrna, North Smyrna ES Addition/Renovation (77/23) 8,411,200 2,512,400 10,923,600
Appoquinimink, New MS and HS at Summit
Campus (77/23) 18,438,958 5,507,741 23,946,699
Red Clay, AI duPont MS Renovations (60/40) 4,218,068 2,812,045 7,030,113
Red Clay, Brandywine Springs School Renovations (60/40) 5,622,207 3,748,138 9,370,345


Red Clay, Bus Maintenance Building (60/40) 600,000 400,000 1,000,000
Red Clay, Conrad Schools for Science Renovations (60/40) 1,065,187 710,124 1,775,311
Red Clay, Dickinson HS Renovations (60/40) 8,074,280 5,382,852 13,457,132
Red Clay, Forest Oak ES Renovations (60/40) 513,187 342,125 855,312
Red Clay, Johnson ES Renovations (60/40) 3,736,569 2,491,046 6,227,615
Red Clay, Lewis ES Renovations (60/40) 5,321,668 3,547,778 8,869,446
Red Clay, Linden Hill ES Renovations (60/40) 530,549 353,699 884,248
Red Clay, McKean HS Renovations (60/40) 13,042,741 8,695,161 21,737,902
Red Clay, Mote ES Renovations (60/40) 7,519,821 5,013,214 12,533,035
Red Clay, Richardson Park ES Renovations (60/40) 581,468 387,645 969,113
Red Clay, Skyline MS Renovations (60/40) 515,944 343,963 859,907
Red Clay, Stanton MS Renovations (60/40) 9,725,786 6,483,858 16,209,644
Red Clay, Warner ES Renovations (60/40) 858,043 572,029 1,430,072
Colonial, Gunning Bedford MS Renovations (60/40) 2,245,049 1,496,698 3,741,747
Colonial, McCullough MS Renovations (60/40) 383,179 255,452 638,631
Colonial, New Castle ES Renovations (60/40) 5,642,233 3,761,489 9,403,722
Colonial, William Penn HS Renovations (100% State) 10,817,207 10,817,207
Colonial, Wilmington Manor ES Renovations (60/40) 227,078 151,385 378,463
Delmar, New District Office (100% Local) 3,000,000 3,000,000
NCCVT, Paul M. Hodgson Replacement (62/38) 16,777,572 10,283,028 27,060,600
NCCVT, Paul M. Hodgson Vocational Technical
High School Field House (100% Local) 1,619,612 1,619,612
Sussex Tech, New Sussex Tech HS (60/40) 10,698,900 7,132,568 17,831,468
Christina, Delaware School for the
Deaf Renovations (100% State) 1,685,070 1,685,070
Red Clay, Meadowood School Renovations (60/40) 1,917,874 1,278,582 3,196,456
Subtotal 145,226,238 87,115,316 232,341,554
TOTAL $339,145,000
Section 3. Appropriation of General Funds. It is the intent of the General Assembly that $427,464,897
$368,340,039 be appropriated to the following departments of the State and in the following amount for the purposes


set forth in the Section 1 Addendum of this Act. Any funds remaining unexpended or unencumbered by June 30,
2027 2028 shall revert to the General Fund of the State of Delaware.
Department, Agency or Instrumentality Amount
Office of Management and Budget $108,296,751 $107,663,102
Delaware State Housing Authority 15,500,000 38,000,000
Department of Technology and Information 18,567,000
State 146,875,000 99,447,714
Finance 5,000,000
Health and Social Services 13,000,000 16,067,596
Services for Children, Youth and their Families 200,000
Correction 5,000,000
Natural Resources and Environmental Control 37,298,700 59,284,377
Safety and Homeland Security 3,500,000 1,000,000
Agriculture 6,290,000 7,650,000
Fire School 142,500
Delaware National Guard 200,000
University of Delaware 17,000,000
Delaware State University 17,000,000
Delaware Technical Community College 17,000,000 1,389,076
Education 22,137,446 32,295,674
TOTAL $427,464,897 $368,340,039

Section 4. Transfer to the State Treasurer’s Agency Bond Reversion Account.
Department, Agency, Instrumentality Appropriation Code Amount
Office of Management and Budget
New Jobs Infrastructure 2012-10-02-11-50369 $1,958,125.01
New Troop 7 - Lewes 2017-10-02-50-50055 173.85
Veteran’s Home Generator 2021-10-02-50-50212 900,000.00
Motor Pool Building Conversion 2020-10-02-50-50200 $221,903.61
Veteran’s Home Generator 2021-10-02-50-50212 61,060.60
BWCI HVAC Replacement 2022-10-02-50-50304 262,692.00
New JTVCC Sally Port/Intake 2025-10-02-50-50042 8,000,000.00


Department of Health and Social Services
Wellness Center 2022-35-05-20-50257 47,103.75
Delaware National Guard
FMS #1 Conversion Project 2024-76-01-01-50535 2,250,000.00
Department of Education
Brandywine, Environmental Compliance 2018-95-31-00-50002 33.00
NCC Votech, Environmental Compliance 2018-95-38-00-50002 19,161.70
TOTAL $5,127,493.56 $8,592,759.96
Section 5. Transfer from the State Treasurer’s Agency Bond Reversion Account.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other state law, the State Treasurer shall transfer, as funds become
available, the sum of $5,127,493.56 $8,592,759.96 from the State Treasurer’s Bond Reversion Account (94-
12-05-03-50015) to the following departments in the following amount for the purpose set forth in the Section
1 Addendum of this Act.
Department, Agency, Instrumentality Amount
Office of Management and Budget
OMB Project
Environmental Compliance (UST/Asbestos/Other) $19,194.70
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment $61,060.60
Correction Projects
Automatic Transfer Switch and Emergency Generator Replacements
(HRYCI, BWCI, JTVCC, and SCI) 900,000.00 2,500,000.00
HYRCI West Side, JTVCC Infirmary Roof Top and PCCC
Administration Building HVAC Replacements 5,886,560.00
JTVCC Building 13 Roof Replacement 98,035.61
Safety and Homeland Security Project
New Troop 4 - Georgetown 173.85
Department of Health and Social Services
Maintenance and Restoration 47,103.75
Delaware National Guard
Dagsboro Readiness Center Design and Expansion 1,708,125.01
Scannell Readiness Center Expansion/Renovations 2,500,000.00
TOTAL $5,127,493.56 $8,592,759.96
Section 6. Transfer to the State Treasurer’s School Bond Reversion Account.
Project Appropriation Code Amount
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 2019/20-95-01-01-50022 $46,679.00
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 2014/15/16/17/18-95-01-05-50022 37,521.43
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 2020-95-10-00-50022 2,442.50
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 2017/18-95-15-00-50022 33.44
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 2016/17/18-95-31-00-50022 1,997.63


Voc Equipment Replacement 2015/16/17/18-95-31-00-50324 2.00
Architectural Barrier Removal 2013/17/21-95-31-00-50392 6.82
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 2013/14-95-32-00-50022 640.75
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 2014/17/18-95-33-00-50022 1,480.48
Voc Equipment Replacement 2013/14/15/16/17/18/20-95-33-00-50324 3,596.35
Architectural Barrier Removal 2013/14/16-95-33-00-50392 3,570.68
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 2017/19-95-34-00-50022 3,138.67
Voc Equipment Replacement 2013-95-34-00-50324 2,453.00
Voc Equipment Replacement 2019-95-35-00-50324 687.83
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 2020-95-36-00-50022 .01
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 2021-95-37-00-50022 .49
Voc Equipment Replacement 2020-95-37-00-50324 335.60
Roof Repairs at Howard HS Skill Center 2015-95-38-00-50017 787.00
Voc Equipment Replacement 2017/19/21-95-38-00-50324 .17
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 2019-95-53-00-50022 469.43
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 2014/15/16/17-95-54-00-50022 22,371.38
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 2014-95-68-00-50022 .03
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 2018-95-76-00-50022 .20
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 2017-95-82-00-50022 .01
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 2023-95-01-01-50022 $1,465.00
Caesar Rodney, St. Thomas More Renovations 2023-95-10-00-50347 6,824,920.00
TOTAL $128,214.90 $6,826,385.00
Section 7. Transfer from the State Treasurer’s School Bond Reversion Account. Notwithstanding
the provisions of any other state law, the State Treasurer shall transfer, as funds become available, the sum of
$128,214.90 $6,826,385.00 from the State Treasurer’s Bond Reversion Account (94-12-05-03-50229) to the
following department in the following amount for the purpose set forth in the Section 1 Addendum of this Act.
Department, Agency or Instrumentality Amount
Education
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment $123,850.40 $6,826,385.00
Architectural Barrier Removal 3,577.50
NCCVT, Paul M. Hodgson Replacement (62/38) 787.00
TOTAL $128,214.90 $6,826,385.00
Section 8. General Fund Reprogramming. (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other state
law, the General Assembly hereby directs the State Treasurer to transfer appropriation balances, not in excess
of the balances below from the following General Fund projects and reauthorizes the funds to the departments
listed in subsection (b) of this Section, according to the purposes in the Section 1 Addendum of this Act.
Department, Agency or Instrumentality Appropriation Code Amount
Office of Management and Budget
Construction/Federal Contingency 2019-10-02-11-10092 $337,779
Baylor Women’s Residential
Treatment Unit 2022-10-02-50-10258 3,276,000
JTVCC New Sally Port/Intake Facility 2023-10-02-50-10302 $2,934,770.28
JTVCC New Sally Port/Intake Facility 2024-10-02-50-10302 4,593,700.00


Troop 7, Lewes 2024-10-02-50-10911 2,035,284.72
Department of State
Veterans Home Bus Replacement 2024-20-09-01-10051 40,400.00
Experimental Program to Stimulate
Competitive Research (EPSCOR-RII) 2023-20-10-01-10066 32,000.00
Experimental Program to Stimulate
Competitive Research (EPSCOR-RII) 2024-20-10-01-10066 800,000.00
Transportation Infrastructure
Investment Fund 2022-20-10-01-10185 900,000.00
Transportation Infrastructure
Investment Fund 2023-20-10-01-10185 80,000.00
Department of Education
DOE Market Pressure 2024-95-01-01-10187 26,678,593.12
Minor Capital Improvement
and Equipment 2024-95-01-01-10230 1,769.00
TOTAL $3,613,779 $38,096,517.12
(b) Department, Agency or Instrumentality Amount
Office of Management and Budget
JTVCC Building 13 Roof Replacement $1,370,310.28
Department of State
Museum Maintenance 40,400.00
Bioscience Center for Advanced Technology (CAT) 32,000.00
Experimental Program to Stimulate
Competitive Research (EPSCOR-RII) 800,000.00
Transportation Infrastructure
Investment Fund 980,000.00
Department of Correction
Maintenance and Restoration 3,276,000.00
Level IV and V Security Camera Equipment 6,158,160.00
Delaware National Guard
Maintenance and Restoration 200,000.00
Cheswold Readiness Center – Design 137,779.00
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 500,000.00
Bethany Beach Training Site 510,284.72
Dagsboro Readiness Center 825,000.00
Penns Way 200,000.00
Department of Education
Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment 1,769.00
Colonial, William Penn HS Renovations 26,678,593.12
TOTAL $3,613,779.00 $38,096,517.12
Section 9. Special Fund Reprogramming. (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other state law,
the General Assembly hereby directs the State Treasurer to transfer appropriation balances not in excess of the


balances below from the following Special Funds and reauthorizes the funds to the departments listed in
subsection (b) of this Section, according to the purposes in the Section 1 Addendum of this Act.
Department, Agency, or Instrumentality Appropriation Code Amount
Judicial
Tech Fund 2018-02-17-01-25000 $0.77
Court Security 2014-02-17-01-25199 84,797.20
Office of Management and Budget
Complete Communities 2012-10-02-11-25117 10,000.00
Emergency Health Funds 2020-10-02-11-25234 3,400,000.00
Department of State
Urban Redevelopment 2020-20-10-01-25374 1,508.50
Department of Safety and Homeland Security
Twin Engine Helicopter 2021-45-01-01-25375 2.53
Department of Education
Architectural Barrier Removal 2012-95-01-05-25029 1,465.00
Minor Capital Improvements
and Equipment 2012-95-01-05-25102 116,373.00
Architectural Barrier Removal 2015-95-01-05-25348 54,280.82
Architectural Barrier Removal 2012-95-31-00-25029 2,053.45
Christina Renovate Brennan School 2018-95-33-00-25392 22,945.37
TOTAL $3,693,426.64
(b) Department, Agency, or Instrumentality Amount
Judicial
Minor Capital Improvements and Equipment $84,800.50
Office of Management and Budget
Architectural Barrier Removal 10,000.00
Carvel State Office Building Maintenance and Restoration 1,000,000.00
Minor Capital Improvements and Equipment 400,000.00
JTVCC HVAC Project 2,000,000.00
Department of State
Delaware Prosperity Partnership 1,508.50
Department of Education
Architectural Barrier Removal 57,799.27
Minor Capital Improvements and Equipment 116,373.00
Christina, Delaware School for the Deaf Renovations 22,945.37
TOTAL $3,693,426.64
Section 10. Continuing Appropriations. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024 2025, any sums
in the following accounts shall remain as continuing appropriations and shall not be subject to reversion until
June 30, 2025 2026.


Fiscal Year(s) Appropriation Code Description
2022/23 01-08-02-10093 Community Reinvestment Fund
2019 01-08-02-10113 Technology Fund
2022 02-03-10-10020 MCI – Judicial
2020 02-06-10-10020 MCI – Judicial
2020/22 02-13-10-10020 MCI – Judicial
2019/22 02-17-01-10020 MCI – Judicial
2023 10-02-11-10009 ERP
2019 10-02-11-10092 Construction/Federal Contingency
2020 10-02-11-10093 Community Reinvestment Fund
2020 10-02-11-10094 Municipal Infrastructure Fund
2019 10-02-11-10113 Technology Fund
2023 10-02-11-10918 Clean Water
2012 10-02-11-50369 New Jobs Infrastructure
2023 10-02-32-10009 ERP
2023 10-02-50-10001 Legislative Hall Improvements
2023 10-02-50-10005 CSOB Maintenance and Restoration
2022/23 10-02-50-10020 MCI/Judicial
2022 2023 10-02-50-10023 MCI/DHSS
2022/23 10-02-50-10025 MCI/Safety
2022/23 10-02-50-10026 MCI/STATE
2020/ 2022/23 10-02-50-10027 MCI/DSCYF
2020/ 2022/23 10-02-50-10031 MCI/DOC
2021 10-02-50-10035 MCI/DNG
2022 10-02-50-10075 Security, Technology
2023 10-02-50-10091 Roof Replacements
2022/23 10-02-50-10122 Deferred Maintenance
2019 10-02-50-10125 Veterans Home Bathing
2020 10-02-50-10156 Veterans Home Dental Suite
2023 10-02-50-10172 800 MHz Shelter Replacement
2022/23 10-02-50-10181 CSOB Mechanical Upgrades
2022/23 10-02-50-10186 Cleveland White Renovations
2023 10-02-50-10187 Market Pressure
2023 10-02-50-10206 CSOB Mechanical Upgrades
2022 10-02-50-10214 Richardson and Robinson Mech Upgrades
2022/23 10-02-50-10220 Kent and Sussex Family Court Facilities
2022/23 10-02-50-10221 Customs House
2022 10-02-50-10222 Delaware Psychiatric Center Anti-Ligature
2022 10-02-50-10223 Holloway Campus Electrical System Replacement
2022 10-02-50-10224 Holloway Campus Mitchell Building HVAC
2022 10-02-50-10227 State Service Center Redesign and Improvements
2022/23 10-02-50-10230 MCI Equipment
2022/23 10-02-50-10238 Absalom Jones Performing Arts Center
2022 10-02-50-10255 JVTCC Security Door
2022 10-02-50-10256 SCI Door & Door Jamb Replacements
2022 10-02-50-10257 HRYCI Security Door Replacements
2022 2023 10-02-50-10258 BWCI Residential Treatment Unit
2022/23 10-02-50-10259 New Troop 6 - Wilmington
2022/23 10-02-50-10280 MCI & Eq DDA
2022 10-02-50-10282 Generator – New Castle Fire Training Center
2023 10-02-50-10286 Herman Holloway Campus Improvements
2023 10-02-50-10287 Howard R Young Improvements
2023 10-02-50-10288 Planning/Engineering Studies
2023 10-02-50-10290 DHCI Renovations


2023 10-02-50-10291 Jesse Cooper Building Improvements
2023 10-02-50-10292 LL Williams Justice Center Improvements
2023 10-02-50-10293 900 King Street Renovations
2023 10-02-50-10298 BWCI Renovations
2023 10-02-50-10300 HRYCI Renovations
2023 10-02-50-10302 JVTCC Renovations
2023 10-02-50-10303 New Troop 4 – Georgetown
2023 10-02-50-10316 Planning and Engineering
2023 10-02-50-10318 Fire School Renovation
2023 10-02-50-10325 Domestic Violence Coordination Council
2023 10-02-50-10343 Land and Buildings Acquisition
2022 10-02-50-50005 Roof Replacements OMB
2009 10-02-50-50006 800 MHz
2020/22 10-02-50-50009 Kent and Sussex Judicial Court Facilities
2021 10-02-50-50010 Veterans Home Bathing
2016/17/22 10-02-50-50021 HRYCI Old Kitchen Space Renovation
2019 10-02-50-50055 New Troop 7, Lewes
2021 10-02-50-50060 MCI - Judicial
2021 10-02-50-50061 MCI – Dept of State
2021 10-02-50-50066 MCI – Safety & Homeland
2020 10-02-50-50199 JTVCC Perimeter Fence
2020 10-02-50-50200 Motor Pool Bldg Conver
2021 10-02-50-50212 Veterans Home Generator
2021 10-02-50-50220 Minor Capital Imp & Eq
2022 10-02-50-50243 Sussex County Courthouse Improvements
2021 10-02-50-50301 Leonard L. Williams Justice Center Improvement
2022 10-02-50-50302 Legislative Hall Improvements
2022 10-02-50-50303 Absalom Jones Improvements
2022 10-02-50-50304 BWCI HVAC Replacement
2021 10-02-50-50306 MCI OMB
2020 10-02-50-50370 Roof Replacement – DHSS
2023 10-02-50-50523 New Troop 4 - Georgetown
2015 10-02-50-59920 Generator Replacements
2022 10-02-50-59952 Environmental Compliance
2022 10-02-50-59964 Leonard L. Williams Justice
2020 10-02-50-59965 Veterans Home Bathing
2021/ 2022 10-02-50-59976 Minor Cap Improv & Equ
2023 10-02-50-59987 Minor Cap Improvements
2023 10-07-01-10325 Domestic Violence Coordination Council
1994 12-05-03-50015 Agency Reversions
1994 12-05-03-50229 School Reversions
2020 20-06-01-10122 Deferred Maintenance
2023 20-06-01-10132 Park Rehab – Fort Christina
2020/23 20-06-01-10184 Weldin House Improvements
2022 20-06-01-10265 Nassau School
2022 20-06-01-10268 Read House
2022 20-06-01-50069 Museum Maintenance
2020 20-06-01-59966 John Dickinson Plantation
2023 20-08-01-10104 Harrington Public Library
2022/23 20-08-01-10261 North Wilmington Public Library
2023 20-08-01-10310 Corbit-Calloway Memorial Library
2023 20-08-01-10311 Duck Creek Regional Library
2023 20-08-01-10312 Newark Free Library
2023 20-08-01-10313 Rehoboth Beach Public Library


2023 20-08-01-10314 Selbyville Public Library
2018 20-08-01-50065 Harrington Public Library
2021 20-08-01-50116 Selbyville Public Library
2021 20-08-01-50214 Rehoboth Beach Public Library
2017/18/ 2019 20-08-01-50364 Duck Creek Regional Library
2019 20-08-01-59958 Duck Creek Regional Library
2020 20-08-01-59967 North Wilmington Public Library
2020/21 20-08-01-59968 Rehoboth Beach Public Library
2023 20-10-01-10066 EPSCoR-Exper Program
2023 20-10-01-10167 Laboratories
2022/23 20-10-01-10185 Transportation Infrastructure Investment Fund
2022/23 20-10-01-10262 Site Readiness Fund
2022 20-10-01-10267 Grand Opera House
2023 25-05-01-10009 ERP
2022 2023 35-01-30-10118 Maintenance and Restoration DHSS
2022 35-01-30-50088 DPH Lab Renovation and Expansion
2023 35-05-20-10074 Drinking Water State Revolving Fund
2022 35-05-20-50257 School Wellness Center
2021 35-05-20-59979 Drinking Water State Revolving Fund
2022 35-07-02-10229 State Service Center CAPS Replacement
2022 35-12-30-10229 State Service Center CAPS Replacement
2022 2023 38-04-40-10075 Level IV and V Security Camera Equipment
2021 38-04-40-10207 700 MHz Radio System Upgrade
2022 38-04-40-10218 Technology Systems
2022 38-04-40-10255 JVTCC Security Door
2022/23 40-01-01-10044 Delaware Bayshore Initiative
2023 40-01-01-10277 MCI & Eq DNREC
2020/21 40-01-01-50194 Delaware Bayshore Initiative
2022/23 40-01-06-10079 Clean Water State Revolving Fund
2020 40-01-06-10918 Clean Water State Revolving Fund
2021 40-01-06-59981 Clean Water State Revolving Fund
2023 40-03-02-10118 Maintenance & Restoration
2023 40-03-02-10132 Lums Pond Cabins/Trap Pond Splash Pad/White
Clay Creek Nature Center
2020/21/ 2022/23 40-03-02-10159 Prk Fctly Rehab Publ Rec Infrastructure
2022 40-03-02-10191 Bellevue State Park Improvements
2022 40-03-02-10193 White Clay Creek Big Pond
2022 40-03-02-10273 Fox Point Park
2022 40-03-02-10274 Garrisons Renovations
2023 40-03-02-10331 Open Space
2023 40-03-02-10345 Trails and Pathways
2017/22 40-03-02-50086 Statewide Trails and Pathways
2020 40-03-02-59922 Redevelopment of Strategic Sites
(NVF/Fort DuPont)
2019 40-03-02-59960 Park Facility Rehab
2019/21/22/23 40-03-04-10078 Conservation Reserve Enhancement
2022/23 40-03-04-10129 Dikes and Dams
2023 40-03-04-10138 Tax Ditches
2022/23 40-03-04-10164 Debris Pits
2019/20/22/23 40-03-04-10165 Resource Conservation & Development
2022 40-03-04-10166 New Castle Pier
2020 40-03-04-10197 Marshallton Drainage
2014 40-03-04-10246 Holts Landing Dredging
2020/ 2022/23 40-03-04-10251 Shoreline and Waterway


2022 40-03-04-10275 Meeting House Branch and Tarr Ditch Drainage
2014/17 40-03-04-50087 Dikes/Dams
2017 40-03-04-50125 Pier and Dredging Project
2020/21 40-03-04-59910 Dikes/Dams
2023 40-03-04-59936 Tax Ditches
2018 40-03-04-59943 High Hazard Dam and Dike
2019 40-03-04-59961 Dikes/Dams
2020 40-03-04-59969 Conservation Reserve
2021/22 40-03-04-59983 Resource Conservation & Development
2023 40-04-04-10272 Christina/Brandywine River Remediation
2021 2023 45-01-20-10208 800 MHz Technology Refresh
2022 45-01-20-50108 800 MHz Technology Refresh
2023 45-01-30-10171 School Safety and Security
2022 45-01-30-10279 Emergency Management Resiliency Fund
2010 55-05-00-95401 FHWA
2010 55-05-00-95402 FTA
2010 55-05-00-95403 Federal-Other
2010 55-05-00-95404 TIFIA Loan
2010/11/12/13/14/15/16/17/18/19/
20/21/22/23 55-05-00-95601 Grants & Allocations
2010/11/12/13/14/15/16/17/18/19/
20/21/22 /23 55-05-00-97301 Transit System
2010/11/12/13/14/15/16/17/18/19/
20/21/22/23 55-05-00-97601 Support System
2010/11/12/13/14/15/16/17/18/19/
20/21/22/23 55-05-00-97701 Road System
2021 55-05-00-97801 GARVEE Fund
2016 55-05-00-97802 US 301 Toll Revenue Bond
2022 60-01-10-10218 Technology Systems
2023 65-01-12-10202 Cover Crop Investment
2020 65-01-12-10203 Irrigation System Conversion
2023 75-02-01-10281 Concrete Repair – Dover Fire School
2020/21/22/23 76-01-01-10035 Minor Cap Imprv Equip DNG
2023 76-01-01-10075 Security and Technology
2023 76-01-01-10213 River Road Readiness Center
2022 76-01-01-50238 Bethany Beach Training Site Barracks
2019 90-01-01-10134 HED Econ Dvlpt Invest
2023 90-01-01-10167 Laboratories
2022 2023 90-01-01-10283 Shellfish Aquaculture
2022 90-01-01-50088 Laboratories
2022 90-03-01-10122 Deferred Maintenance
2020/ 2022/23 90-03-01-10168 Campus Improvements
2022/23 90-03-01-10212 Excellence Through Technology
2020/21/22 90-03-01-50093 Campus Improvements
2020 90-03-01-50198 New Land Grant Facility
2021 90-03-01-50273 Excellence Through Technology
2020/ 2022 90-04-01-10134 HED Economic Development
Investment Fund
2022 2023 90-04-01-10170 Critical Capital Needs
2021/22 90-04-01-50353 Critical Capital Needs
2023 95-01-01-10337 Enhanced MCI
2023 95-10-00-10337 Enhanced MCI
2022 95-10-00-50022 MCI


2023 95-10-00-50347 Caesar Rodney, St. Thomas More Renovation
2023 95-11-00-50022 MCI
2022 95-13-00-10284 Capital, William Henry MS Restoration
2023 95-13-00-10337 Enhanced MCI
2022/23 95-13-00-50311 Capital, Construct 800 Student MS Bldg 2
2022/23 95-13-00-50312 Capital, Convert Wm Henry MS to Kent County
Secondary ILC Renovation
2022/23 95-13-00-50313 Capital, Convert Wm Henry MS to Kent County
Community School Renovation
2020/21/ 2022 95-13-00-50345 Capital, Construct 800 Student MS Bldg 1
2021 95-13-00-50498 Capital, Construct Kent County Community School
Classrooms at MS Building 1
2023 95-15-00-50324 Voc Equipment Replacement
2023 95-16-00-10337 Enhanced MCI
2022 2023 95-16-00-50022 MCI
2022 95-16-00-50324 Voc Equipment Replacement
2013/14/15 95-16-00-50394 Laurel, Construct 1200 Student ES
2022/23 95-17-00-10187 Cape Henlopen Market Pressure
2023 95-17-00-10337 Enhanced MCI
2021 95-17-00-50467 Renovate Milton ES
2019/21 95-17-00-50482 Renovate Lewes School and Demolish
Shields
2019/21 95-17-00-50492 Addition to Cape Henlopen HS
2020 95-17-00-50497 Sussex Consortium Expansion
2021/22/23 95-17-00-50499 Cape Henlopen, Construct New 600 Student MS
2023 95-18-00-10337 Enhanced MCI
2022 95-18-00-50022 MCI
2022 2023 95-18-00-50316 Milford, Revitalize Milford MS
2022 95-23-00-50022 MCI
2023 95-24-00-10337 Enhanced MCI
2022 2023 95-24-00-50022 MCI
2022 95-24-00-50314 Smyrna, Land Purchase
2023 95-24-00-50319 Smyrna Market Pressure
2023 95-24-00-50324 Voc Equipment Replacement
2021 95-24-00-50504 Smyrna, N Smyrna ES Roof Replacement
2023 95-24-00-50517 Smyrna, Clayton Intermediate Addition
2023 95-24-00-50518 Smyrna, New 600 Student ES
2023 95-24-00-50519 Smyrna, North Smyrna ES Addition/Renovation
2022 95-29-00-10187 Appoquinimink Market Pressure
2023 95-29-00-10337 Enhanced MCI
2023 95-29-00-50319 Appoquinimink Market Pressure
2019/21/22 95-29-00-50484 Replace Everett Meredith MS
2021 95-29-00-50486 Renovate Silver Lake ES
2021/22 95-29-00-50500 Appo New 330 Student Kindergarten Center
2022/ 2023 95-29-00-50501 Appo New 840 Student ES
2021 95-29-00-50509 Appo HS Turf Fields (2) Replacements
2021/ 2022 95-29-00-50512 Appo Middletown HS Roof and HVAC
Replacement
2021/ 2023 95-29-00-50520 Appoquinimink Louis L Redding MS
2023 95-31-00-10338 Brandywine, Bush School
2022 95-31-00-50317 Brandywine, Bush School
2020 95-31-00-59970 School Safety and Security
2022 95-32-00-50022 MCI
2022 95-32-00-50324 Voc Equipment Replacement


2022/23 95-33-00-10135 City of Wilmington Education Initiatives
2022 95-33-00-10187 City of Wilmington Education Initiatives
Market Pressure
2020 95-33-00-10213 City of Wilmington Education Initiatives
2023 95-33-00-10321 Christina, Brennen Renovations
2021/22 95-33-00-50022 MCI
2022 95-33-00-50134 City of Wilmington Education Initiatives
2020/ 2021 95-33-00-50140 City of Wilmington Education Initiatives
2022 95-33-00-50324 Voc Equipment Replacement
2022 95-33-00-50355 Architectural Barrier Removal
2021 95-33-00-50506 Christina Early Education Center Mechanical
And Electrical Renovation
2021 95-33-00-50507 Christina Marshall ES HVAC
2021 95-33-00-59950 City of Wilmington Education Initiatives
2020 95-33-00-59970 School Safety and Security
2023 95-34-00-10337 Enhanced MCI
2022 95-34-00-50022 MCI
2023 95-36-00-10171 School Safety and Security
2022 95-36-00-10187 Sussex Central HS Market Pressure
2023 95-36-00-10323 Indian River, Ennis Classrooms at the
New Sussex Central HS
2019 95-36-00-50488 Replace Howard T. Ennis
2021/22/23 95-36-00-50503 IR Const New Sussex Central HS
2023 95-37-00-10337 Enhanced MCI
2019 95-38-00-10112 Delaware Skills Center
2023 95-38-00-10171 School Safety and Security
2023 95-38-00-10187 NCCVT, Hodgson Market Pressure
2023 95-38-00-10337 Enhanced MCI
2023 95-38-00-50319 NCCVT, Hodgson Market Pressure
2022 2023 95-38-00-50324 Voc Equipment Replacement
2023 95-38-00-50521 NCCVT, Paul M. Hodgson HS Replacement
2018 95-38-00-50526 Delcastle Technical HS
2023 95-39-00-10337 Enhanced MCI
2023 95-39-00-10340 Polytech, Drainage and Stormwater
2021 95-39-00-50022 MCI
2022/23 95-39-00-50324 Voc Equipment Replacement
2023 95-40-00-50522 Sussex Tech, New Sussex Tech HS
2023 95-51-00-50022 MCI
2023 95-53-00-50524 Colonial, Leach Land Purchase
2023 95-69-00-10337 Enhanced MCI
2023 95-70-00-10171 School Safety and Security
2021 95-76-00-50022 MCI
2023 95-77-00-10171 School Safety and Security
2023 95-80-00-10337 Enhanced MCI
2023 95-86-00-10171 School Safety and Security
2023 95-86-00-10337 Enhanced MCI
2023 95-92-00-10337 Enhanced MCI
2023 96-04-00-10171 School Safety and Security
2023 96-05-00-10337 Enhanced MCI
2023 96-07-00-10337 Enhanced MCI
2023 96-14-00-10337 Enhanced MCI


Section 11. Prefatory Language. This Act has been prepared in conformance with 78 Del. Laws, c.
90. For all sections with the exception of Section 1 Addendum, all comparisons to the previous year’s Budget
Act are shown noting insertions by underlining and deletions by strikethrough.
Section 12. Conservation Districts - Federal Acquisition Regulations. Conservation Districts shall not
be required to follow the provisions of the Federal Acquisition Regulations unless specifically required under a
contract(s) with a federal agency or federal grant. If the Conservation Districts are required to follow subpart 31.2 of
the Federal Acquisition Regulations, then the Conservation Districts are hereby authorized to charge an additional 10
percent to their overhead cost rate to enable the Conservation Districts to continue to fulfill their statutory duties and
responsibilities.
Section 13. First State Preservation Revolving Fund, Inc. For the current fiscal year, First State
Preservation Revolving Fund, Inc. may continue to expend, for administrative expenses, the interest generated by the
Community Redevelopment Fund appropriations of $250,000 in each of Fiscal Years 1999 and 2000.
Section 14. Laurel Redevelopment Corporation. Any proceeds from the sale of property funded in whole
or in part from Community Redevelopment Fund grants to Laurel Redevelopment Corporation shall be reinvested in
redevelopment projects within the Town of Laurel.
Section 15. Bond Bill Reporting Requirements. All state agencies and public school districts receiving
funds from the Bond and Capital Improvements Act shall submit a quarterly expenditure status report to the Director
of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General on all incomplete projects that are wholly or
partially funded with state and/or local funds, including bond funds. The format and information required in these
quarterly reports shall include, but not be limited to, expenditures of both bond and cash funds. The report format
will be developed by the Office of Management and Budget and include information as needed by the Department of
Finance, the Office of the State Treasurer and the Office of Management and Budget to anticipate cash and bond
requirements for the upcoming fiscal year.
Section 16. Notification. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller
General shall notify affected state agencies and other instrumentalities of the State as to certain relevant provisions of
this Act. Additionally, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General shall notify
the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House as to any legislative appointments required by
this Act.


Section 17. Higher Education Research and Education. The Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes
appropriations to the Department of Transportation and the Department of Natural Resources and Environmental
Control. In an effort to best utilize resources available to the State, including federal funding, to the State’s benefit
and, notwithstanding 29 Del. C. c. 69 or any other statutory provision to the contrary, the General Assembly hereby
permits the departments, within the limits of funding provided to support research and education efforts to enter into
agreements directly with the University of Delaware, Delaware State University and Delaware Technical Community
College. This authorization is limited to conducting basic or applied research; transferring knowledge regarding
scientific and technological advancements; and providing practical training to the state and local governments in the
application of science or technology, and encourages the departments to consider these three institutions as the
resource of first resort in meeting any of their research and/or educational needs.


LEGISLATIVE
Section 18. Legislative Building Committee. (a) The Legislative Building Committee (“Committee”) is
established to do all of the following:
(1) Serve as a liaison between the General Assembly and the Division of Facilities Management, architect,
general contractor, and others involved in the design of, construction of, and furnishing of equipment for the
addition to, and parking garage for, Legislative Hall. The Committee may make decisions related to the design,
construction, and furnishing of equipment for the addition to, and parking garage for, Legislative Hall or may
make recommendations to Legislative Council on needed decisions related to the design, construction, and
furnishing of equipment for the addition to, and parking garage for, Legislative Hall.
(2) Engage legislators, legislative staff, others who routinely appear before the General Assembly, and the
public regarding the design of, construction of, and furnishing of equipment for the addition to, and parking
garage for, Legislative Hall.
(3) Provide periodic reports to Legislative Council and the Governor on the progress of the design of,
construction of, and furnishing of equipment for the addition to, and parking garage for, Legislative Hall.
(b) The Committee is comprised of the following members, or a designee selected by a member serving by virtue
of position:
(1) Two members of the House of Representatives, 1 member of the majority caucus and 1 member of the
minority caucus, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(2) Two members of the Senate, 1 member from the majority caucus and 1 member of the minority caucus,
appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
(3) Three citizens of this State, 1 appointed by the Governor, 1 appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, and 1 appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
(4) The Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives.
(5) The Secretary of the Senate.
(6) The Controller General.
(7) The Chief of the Capitol Police.
(8) The Director of the Division of Research, who shall serve as Secretary to the Committee.
(9) The Director of Legislative Information Systems.
(10) The Chief of Staff for the Senate Majority Caucus.


(11) The Chief of Staff for the Senate Minority Caucus.
(12) The Chief of Staff for the House Majority Caucus.
(13) The Chief of Staff for the House Minority Caucus.
(c) The Secretary of the Senate is the Chair in odd-numbered years and Vice-Chair in even-numbered years, and
the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives is Chair in even-numbered years and Vice-Chair in odd-numbered
years.
(d) (1) A quorum of the Committee is a majority of its members.
(2) Official action by the Committee, including making decisions, findings, and recommendations, requires
the approval of a quorum of the Committee.
(3) The Committee may adopt rules necessary for its operation.
(4) The Chair may invite individuals with relevant expertise to participate in Committee discussions.
(5) A member of the Committee with the ability to designate another individual to attend a Committee
meeting must provide the designation in writing to the Chair. An individual attending a meeting for a
member as a designee has the same duties and rights as the member.
(e) The Chair is responsible for guiding the administration of the Committee by doing, at a minimum, all of the
following:
(1) Setting a date, time, and place for the initial organizational meeting.
(2) Notifying the individuals who are members of the Committee of the formation of the Committee and, if
applicable, notifying a person of the need to appoint a member.
(3) Supervising the Secretary’s preparation and distribution of meeting notices, agendas, minutes,
correspondence, and reports of the Committee.
(4) Sending to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, after
the first meeting of the Committee, the names of the members of the Committee as follows:
a. By position, including if serving as a designee of a member serving by virtue of position.
b. By appointment, including the group the member represents.
(5) Ensuring that periodic written reports are submitted to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives, with copies to all members of the General Assembly, the Governor,
the Librarian of the Division of Research of Legislative Council, and the Delaware Public Archives.


JUDICIAL
Section 19. Court Facilities Improvement Working Group. Recognizing that there are critical unmet
court space needs statewide, including addressing operational deficiencies of the Family Court facilities in Sussex and
Kent Counties, and other downstate court facilities, as identified in the Southern Court Facilities Space Study
(October 31, 2006), a court facilities improvement working group shall be established, consisting of representatives
from the Judicial Branch, the Office of the Governor, the Office of Management and Budget, including Facilities
Management, and the Office of the Controller General, to develop a plan for implementing flexible, cost-effective
and potentially innovative solutions to these and other court facility space issues. The working group shall engage
with the Delaware State Bar Association to obtain input from practitioners who practice in the affected courts
regarding the best manner to ensure that litigants have access to high-quality, dignified, and safe courthouses within
reasonable proximity to their residences, and what combination of courthouses will accomplish that goal in the
manner most cost-effective to taxpayers in the long term. For the same reason, the working group will obtain input
from other state agencies that provide services related to litigants in the affected courts, to consider whether the co-
location of offices would be helpful to those receiving services and be more efficient for state taxpayers in the long
term.
Section 20. Kent and Sussex County Judicial Court Facilities. (a) The Section 1 Addendum of this Act
includes an appropriation of $25,000,000 for Kent and Sussex Family Court Facilities. The Section 1 Addendum of 80
Del. Laws c. 78 and c. 299, 81 Del. Laws c. 303, 82 Del. Laws c. 86, and 83 Del. Laws c. 56, 83 Del. Laws c. 340, and
84 Del. Laws, c. 83 appropriated funding and Section 21 of 81 Del. Laws c. 59 provided spending authority to be used
toward preliminary costs, including planning and design, architectural and engineering work, construction costs and
costs associated with relocating the Department of Justice offices. Efficiencies shall be achieved in this process
through the combining of planning, design, architectural and engineering work for both facilities, in all circumstances
where combined efforts are appropriate and will likely achieve cost savings to the overall project.
(b) Of this amount, $3,610,000 shall be used for the acquisition of tax parcel ID # 135-19.08-154.00, 135-
19.08-146.01, and 135-15.17-148.00 for final space and utility relocations.
(c) Of the total funds appropriated for the new Kent and Sussex Family Court Facilities, any residual funds
from these appropriations may be used for the renovations of the Customs House and/or the Old Kent/Sussex Family
Courthouses.


OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT AND BUDGET
Section 21. Construction Management. Notwithstanding any other state law, the Office of Management
and Budget shall be responsible for the design and construction of all the projects listed under Office of Management
and Budget in the Section 1 Addendum of this Act. For those projects that are solely for the purchase of equipment,
including projects that are funded in any Minor Capital Improvement (MCI) and Equipment line, the Office of
Management and Budget shall transfer the appropriate funding necessary to purchase the equipment to the agency for
which the equipment is being purchased. The appropriate amount of funding shall be determined and agreed to by
the Office of Management and Budget and the agency for which the equipment is being purchased by September 1 of
each fiscal year. For those projects for which the appropriation is passed to an entity and for which the State is not a
party to the construction contract, the Office of Management and Budget shall provide technical assistance.
(a) Notwithstanding any other state law, there is hereby created an Appeals Board, to be composed of the
Lieutenant Governor, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, and the Controller General. The
Appeals Board shall approve the use of all unencumbered monies after that project is deemed substantially complete.
A project shall be deemed substantially complete when the project is occupied by 75 percent of the planned tenants or
when deemed complete by the Appeals Board. One year after a project is deemed substantially complete, any
unencumbered authorization balance shall revert. In no case shall this section empower the Appeals Board to allow
for the expenditure of funds for uses other than for the funds authorized purpose(s). The Controller General shall
notify the Co-Chairs of the Joint Committee on Capital Improvements of any decisions of the Appeals Board.
(b) The use of MCI and Equipment funds in order to ensure completion of a Major Capital Improvement project
involving construction of a new facility is prohibited unless the use of such funds are necessary due to a legal
settlement or emergency or unforeseen conditions as determined by the Director of the Office of Management and
Budget, the Controller General and the Co-Chairs of the Joint Committee on Capital Improvements.
(c) A quarterly status report shall be submitted to the Controller General on all incomplete projects.
(d) No project’s budget should be increased beyond what is appropriated in any Bond and Capital Improvements
Act, either with special funds or private funds, unless the use of those funds is approved by the appropriate cabinet
secretary, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, the Controller General and the Co-Chairs of the
Joint Committee on Capital Improvements.
Section 22. Construction Manager. It is the intent of the General Assembly that all public works
projects, including all public school projects, that utilize a construction manager on the project, utilize the delivery


methodology which requires the construction manager to secure a performance and payment bond for their portion of
the work. All subcontractors shall be listed at the start of the project and shall provide a performance and payment
bond which names the construction manager and the State of Delaware as additional insureds. All provisions of 29
Del. C. c. 69 are in effect for projects which utilize a construction manager.
Section 23. Judicial Construction Oversight. It is the intent of the General Assembly that a nine-member
Executive Committee be created to oversee construction of new or major renovation of judicial facilities. The
Executive Committee shall include two members of the legislature appointed by the Co-Chairs of the Joint
Committee on Capital Improvements; the respective Chairs of the House and Senate Judiciary Committees; two
members of the Judiciary as appointed by the Chief Justice; and three members of the Executive Department to
include the Director of Facilities Management, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and their
designee. The Executive Committee shall work in conformation with existing construction oversight guidelines as
written in the Construction Management section of this Act. The Executive Committee is hereby empowered to:
(a) Select appropriate professionals necessary to program, site, design, construct, furnish and equip the
facility;
(b) Provide such oversight to ensure that the final facility provides optimal security and incorporates
maximum operational efficiencies both within the Judiciary and in conjunction with other criminal justice agencies;
(c) Ensure that new construction and/or renovations are completed on schedule; and
(d) Ensure that the cost of new construction and/or renovations does not exceed the authorized budget.
This section shall apply to the following projects: Sussex County Family Court; Kent County Family Court; and any
Judicial construction or renovation project requested by either the Judicial Branch or recommended by the Office of
Management and Budget for the Judicial Branch where the total project cost estimate exceeds $10,000,000.
Section 24. New Castle County Courthouses. Notwithstanding any law or local government ordinance,
resolution, or any deed restrictions to the contrary, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall
designate the name of any state-owned or state-operated courthouse or other judicial building or facility in New
Castle County purchased, constructed, or improved by funds appropriated pursuant to an act of the General Assembly
and shall have the sole authority to approve or disapprove the placement of any statues or memorials in or on the
grounds of such courthouse or judicial building or facility.
Section 25. Card Access Security Systems. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, the
Office of Management and Budget, the Department of Safety and Homeland Security (DSHS), and the Department of


Technology and Information (DTI) shall jointly develop and maintain specifications and standards for card access
security systems for all state facilities. Security system communications using state infrastructure will observe
enterprise standards and policies as defined by DTI pursuant to 29 Del. C. c. 90C. The specifications and standards
shall enable a single-card security solution for all state-owned facilities, require the ability for concurrent central and
local administration of card access functions and shall include a registry of approved card readers and associated
hardware required to implement card access security systems. It is the intent of this section to authorize the Office of
Management and Budget, DSHS, and DTI to jointly select a single supplier, manufacturer or technology of access
cards and security management software for use by all state agencies. The Office of Management and Budget, DSHS,
and DTI shall develop procedures and standards required for the evaluation and approval of agency requests for new
or modified security systems of any type. Before a state agency may install a new security system or modify an
existing system, the agency shall obtain the approval of the Office of Management and Budget, DSHS, and DTI.
Section 26. Design-Build Contracts. The Office of Management and Budget is hereby authorized to
utilize or approve the design-build contract mechanism for up to twelve construction projects that are deemed
necessary by the Director for the efficient construction and improvement of state facilities. Design-build is a project
delivery method under which a project owner, having defined its initial expectations to a certain extent, executes a
single contract for both architectural/engineering services and construction. The selection processes and other terms
of such contracts may vary considerably from project to project. The design-build entity may be a single firm, a
consortium, joint venture, or other organization. However, the fundamental element of design-build delivery remains
that one entity assumes primary responsibility for design and construction of the project. The Office of Management
and Budget is authorized to use this approach in completing its projects, subject to the following conditions:
(a) The contract terms shall include provisions to pay the prevailing wage rates determined by the
Department of Labor, as provided in 29 Del. C. § 6960, in conjunction with federal prevailing wage rates for such
work;
(b) The following additional provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69 shall also be incorporated into these design-build
contracts: § 6962(d)(4)a. (anti-pollution, conservation environmental measures or Energy Star Equipment not covered
by contract specifications); § 6962(d)(7) (equality of employment opportunity); and § 6962(d)(8)(9) (bonding
requirements); and
(c) Any such contracts using federal funding shall conform to all applicable federal laws and regulations
concerning design-build contracting.


(d) The Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an appropriation funding for a A renovation project at 704
N. King Street. This project shall be designated as a design-build project.
(e) All other provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69 shall not be applicable to these projects.
Section 27. Carvel State Office Building. As office space becomes available on the 6th floor of the Carvel
State Office Building, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall consider Legislative space needs
when reallocating available space.
Section 28. 312 Cherry Lane. The use of 312 Cherry Lane, New Castle, located in Riveredge Industrial
Park, being tax parcel 10-015.40-371, as it relates to zoning, subdivision, parking approvals, land development,
construction, permitting, and code enforcement, shall not be subject to the jurisdiction of New Castle County or any
other municipality, provided that it or a portion thereof, is leased by the State of Delaware or an agency thereof,
including if it is thereafter subleased to a private provider, as a medically assisted treatment facility for drug and other
addiction services, including any ancillary related uses such as offices or other treatment programs.
Section 29. Emily P. Bissell. An advisory committee shall be convened as necessary for the purpose of
maintaining communications between the state entities and neighboring communities of the Emily P. Bissell site. The
advisory committee shall consist of the following individuals:
(1) The Director of the Office of Management and Budget or their designee.
(2) The Controller General or their designee.
(3) The Secretary of State or their designee.
(4) The Secretary of the Department Safety and Homeland Security or their designee.
(5) One member of the House of Representatives chosen by the Speaker of the House.
(6) One member of the Delaware State Senate chosen by the President Pro Tempore.
(7) Two members of the public appointed by the Governor representing the surrounding area.
The Office of Management and Budget is authorized to expend Minor Capital Improvements funds
authorized in the Section 1 Addendum to support this process.
The Office of Management and Budget is authorized to utilize any residual funds appropriated to the Office
of Management and Budget, Division of Facilities Management capital projects toward the Emily P. Bissell
renovation.
Section 30. Fund Recoveries. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Delaware Law or this Act to the
contrary, pursuant to federal rules and regulations promulgated by the U.S. Department of the Treasury, all records


and expenditures are subject to a review or audit conducted by, or on behalf of, the U.S. Department of Treasury, the
State Auditor’s Office or designee. Any misrepresentation, misuse, or mishandling of these funds may be subject to
claw-back and other appropriate measures, including the possible reduction or withholding of other State funds.
Section 31. Land and Building Acquisition. Notwithstanding the provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 95 to the
contrary, the Office of Management and Budget, Division of Facilities Management is hereby authorized to acquire
land, buildings, and assets as necessary for capital improvement projects and to reduce leased property, with the
approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, the Co-Chairs of the Joint Committee on Capital
Improvements, and the Controller General.
Section 32. IPA Clean Water Infrastructure. Section 1 Addendum of 83 Del. Laws c. 340 appropriated
$1,770,000 to the Office of Management and Budget. This funding is intended to be used to provide technical grant
assistance to local governments related to infrastructure initiatives and other competitive and formula grant
opportunities available. Funds may be made available to the University of Delaware, Institute for Public
Administration (IPA), Biden School of Public Policy and Administration for direct services to governments at
$354,000 annually for a five-year term. The University of Delaware may not charge an overhead or administrative
fee to the state in relation to this program.
Section 33. Community Workforce Agreement – Office of Management and Budget. The Office of
Management and Budget (OMB) is authorized to engage in a pilot program to include Community Workforce
Agreements as part of large public works projects. There will be two different approaches: 1) Community Workforce
projects and 2) Disadvantaged Business Enterprise (DBE). The pilot program shall include no more than four
projects.
For the three Community Workforce projects, the awarded contractors for the projects will be required to
enter into a Community Workforce Agreement with the agency. The Community Workforce Agreement shall permit
all contractors to subcontract project work or to retain a percentage of their current workforce in order to meet the
requirements of the pilot. OMB shall set the percentage of work for each project to be performed by local labor
organization(s). To achieve the percentages for the projects, the awarded contractors will either hold a separate
contract containing a Collective Bargaining Agreement, contract with a subcontractor that holds a Collective
Bargaining Agreement, or enter into arrangements with local labor organizations that permit the contractors to hire
union workers. In addition, the Community Workforce Agreement may include a minority workforce requirement.


For the Community Workforce projects, the contract award will be based on a form of best value, for which,
29 Del. C. § 6962 (d)(13)a.4. is waived. OMB will establish a best value process, which may include the price,
schedule, and method of complying with the specific requirements of the Community Workforce projects. All bids
are subject to an evaluation for responsiveness and responsibility.
For the purpose of this pilot, Disadvantaged Business Enterprise is defined as for-profit businesses in which
at least 51 percent of the business is owned by one or more individuals who are both socially and economically
disadvantaged; and whose daily operations are managed by one or more individuals who are both socially and
economically disadvantaged. If the project involves a Vocational Technical school, there is a requirement to include a
cooperative program in which students from Vocational Technical schools will work on the project for a set number
of hours at a paid wage rate appropriate for the individual student’s skill level and scope of work. The wage rate will
be established by OMB and the Vocational Technical School District where the project is located and will not be
below the minimum wage rate. This wage rate shall be recognized by the Department of Labor as “OMB Pilot
Program Coop Student Rate” in lieu of a Prevailing Wage rate on the pilot project. This Student Rate is applicable to
this pilot project only.
For projects that are part of the DBE pilot program, the contract award will be based on a form of best value,
for which, 29 Del. C. § 6962 (d)(13)a.4. is waived. The agency will establish a best value process, which may include
the price, schedule, and method of complying with the specific requirements of the pilot project whether it is for
DBE. All bids are subject to an evaluation for responsiveness and responsibility.
To assist the agency in evaluating the success of these pilot programs, the agency shall establish reporting
requirements for the contractors on each project to be included in the awarded contract.
The Office of Management and Budget shall report annually on or before January 1st to the Joint Committee
on Capital Improvement their assessment of the pilot, including, but not limited to, employee hiring statistics, cost
savings, project quality, worker safety, and the effectiveness of contracting disadvantaged businesses, including but
not limited to, subcontractors.
Section 34. Stockley Campus Feasibility Study. The Section 1 Addendum to this Act makes an
appropriation of 84 Del. Laws c. 297 appropriated funds to the Department of Health and Social Services, Minor
Capital Improvement and Equipment. Of this amount, $250,000 shall be used by the Department of Health and Social
Services, Division of Developmental Disabilities Services, to conduct a feasibility study for the revitalization of
Stockley Campus. The purpose of this study is to develop a Stockley Campus revitalization plan to ensure efficient


utilization of the campus to support the community wellness of Delawareans and to ensure community stakeholder
feedback opportunities. The Department of Health and Social Services shall submit a report of findings to the
members of the General Assembly, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, and the Controller
General, on or before September 15, 2025.
Section 35. Carvel State Office Building Mechanical Upgrades. The Office of Management and Budget,
Division of Facilities Management is authorized to utilize any remaining funds from the Carvel State Office Building
Mechanical Upgrades appropriated under Section 1 Addendum of 84 Del. Laws, c. 83, to be used on the Carvel State
Office Building Window Replacements and Roof Replacements (Tatnall Building and Sussex County Court of
Chancery).
Section 36. Troop 6 Residual Appropriation for Troop 4 and DATE Evidence Storage Building. The
Office of Management and Budget, Division of Facilities Management is authorized to utilize any remaining funds
from the New Troop 6 - Wilmington appropriated under Section 1 Addendum of 83 Del. Laws, c. 340 for the New
Troop 4 - Georgetown and DATE Evidence Storage Building.
Section 37. Troop 7. The former State Police Troop 7 in Lewes (Tax ID 334-6.00-526.01) shall not be
declared surplus, transferred to another entity, or subject to improvement without the approval of the co-chairs of the
Joint Committee on Capital Improvement.
Section 38. Family Justice Centers. Section 1 Addendum to this Act appropriates $750,000 for
Family Justice Centers. These funds shall be used toward the design and development of Family Justice
Centers to support capital improvements and renovations.
Section 39. Cyber Security. Section 1 Addendum of this Act appropriates $375,000 to the Office of
Management and Budget (10-02-11) for Cyber Security Services. These funds shall be used for statewide
cyber security needs, including all state agencies and public education.
Section 40. Faithful Friends Property Restriction. The condition placed upon the property deeded
to Faithful Friends in 79 Del. Laws c. 319 §5, restricting its use to a pet adoption and community resource
center, is hereby terminated. In addition, the condition placed upon the property deeded to Faithful Friends in
79 Del. Laws c. 319 §6 regarding a transfer prohibition condition and reversion to the State is hereby
rescinded. A new deed removing the above-referenced conditions may be prepared by Faithful Friends and
recorded by Faithful Friends at its cost in the New Castle County Office of the Recorder of Deeds. The new
deed, as contemplated herein, shall be signed by the Office of Management and Budget prior to recordation.


Section 41. Community Reinvestment Fund. The Section 1 Addendum to this Act makes an
appropriation to the Office of Management and Budget for the Community Reinvestment Fund. It is the intent
of the General Assembly that awards from the Community Reinvestment Fund shall be made pursuant to the
application process approved by the Co-Chairs of the Joint Committee on Capital Improvements and
administered by the Office of Management and Budget and the Office of the Controller General.
Section 42. Minor Capital Improvement and Equipment. The Section 1 Addendum to this Act
makes an appropriation to the Office of Management and Budget, Health and Social Services Projects, Minor
Capital Improvement and Equipment. Of this amount, $200,000 shall be used by the Department of Health and
Social Services, Division of Social Services, to support technology updates related to the ASSIST client portal.
Section 43. Abessinio Stadium Maintenance. The Section 1 Addendum of this Act appropriates
funds for the Office of Management and Budget for Statewide Deferred Maintenance. Of this amount,
$300,000 shall be used toward maintenance needs at Abessinio Stadium.
Section 44. 704 N. King Street. (a) In an effort to reduce the State of Delaware’s lease-related
expenditures, the State has invested over $24 million in the purchase and renovation of 704 N. King Street,
Wilmington (“704 N. King Street facility”) with the intent that the facility will be occupied by the Department
of Justice.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of the Delaware Code to the contrary, upon completion of the
renovations to the 704 N. King Street facility, the following must occur:
(1) The 704 N. King Street facility will serve as the primary location for the operations of the
Attorney General and Department of Justice in the City of Wilmington.
(2) The Office of Management and Budget, through the Division of Facilities Management, and
the Department of Justice will evaluate the Department’s existing leased space in the City of Wilmington
to determine when operations can be consolidated into the 704 N. King Street facility. The evaluation and
relocation must occur as soon as practicable.
(c) Any deviation from the requirements of subsection (b) of this Section require the review and
approval of the Co-Chairs of the Joint Committee on Capital Improvement and the Co-Chairs of the Joint
Finance Committee.
Section 45. DHSS Residual Appropriations. The Office of Management and Budget, Division of
Facilities Management is authorized to utilize any remaining funds from the Delaware Health and Social


Services' Minor Capital Improvements and completed major capital construction projects for use on the
Delaware Hospital for the Chronically Ill project.
Section 46. State Fire Marshal’s Office Residual Funds. The Office of Management and Budget,
Division of Facilities Management is authorized to utilize any remaining funds from Fire Marshal's Office
Building Improvements for the State Fire School's Structural Buildings Repairs/Reconstruction project.


DELAWARE STATE HOUSING AUTHORITY
Section 47. Housing Development Fund - Affordable Rental Housing Program. Section 1 Addendum
of this Act makes an appropriation for the Housing Development Fund - Affordable Rental Housing Program. It is
the intent of the General Assembly and the Administration that said funds are to be used to leverage other funding
sources, such as Low-Income Housing Tax Credits and tax-exempt bonds to help create and/or improve affordable
rental housing stocks in Delaware. This investment in affordable rental housing will increase economic activity in the
State of Delaware. The Director of the Delaware State Housing Authority (DSHA) shall report to the Controller
General and the Director of the Office of Management and Budget no later than April 30, on the expenditure of the
Housing Development Fund appropriated in the Section 1 Addendum of this Act. Said report shall also include the
amount and expenditure of any non-state funds received by the State for said affordable rental housing projects.
Section 48. Urban Redevelopment. (a) Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an appropriation for
a statewide urban redevelopment initiative. DSHA shall administer these funds to incentivize investment in
designated Downtown Development Districts in accordance with state law authorizing the creation of the
Districts and governing the administration of the Downtown Development District Grant program. DSHA is
authorized to use no more than the greater of 5 10 percent or $350,000 of the appropriated amount for the
support of DSHA administrative functions associated with this initiative.
(b) Projects awarded pro-rated amounts of Downtown Development District grants in Fiscal Year 2025 shall
be prioritized for additional funds beyond the pro-rated award amount in Fiscal Year 2026.
Section 49. Strong Neighborhoods Housing Fund. Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an
appropriation to support housing development activities as part of comprehensive revitalization efforts in distressed
areas impacted by blight and crime. DSHA shall administer these funds and is authorized to use no more than the
greater of 5 10 percent or $150,000 of the appropriated amount for the support of DSHA administrative functions
associated with this initiative.
Section 50. Delaware Workforce Housing Program. Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an
appropriation to the Delaware State Housing Authority to support the Delaware Workforce Housing Program
(DWHP) established by Senate Substitute 1 to Senate Bill 22 of the 152nd General Assembly. DSHA shall administer
these funds and is authorized to use no more than 10 percent of the appropriated amount for the support of DSHA
administrative functions associated with this initiative.


Section 51. Affordable Housing Production Initiatives. Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an
appropriation to the Delaware State Housing Authority (10-08-02) for the Housing Development Fund –
Affordable Rental Housing Program. Of these funds, up to $3,000,000 shall be used to increase and expand
funding opportunities for affordable housing as recommended by the Affordable Housing Production
Taskforce (as created by House Bill 442 of the 152nd General Assembly). Such recommendations and
initiatives include, but are not limited to, affordable housing site readiness, state incentives to redevelop
commercial parcels into rental housing, and optimizing and improving the capacity of existing affordable
housing programs and processes.
Section 52. Transfer of Housing Authority Funds. Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes
appropriations to the Delaware State Housing Authority for the Delaware Workforce Housing Program,
Housing Development Fund, and Strong Neighborhoods Housing Fund. Upon request from the Director of the
Delaware State Housing Authority, and approval from the Director of the Office of Management and Budget
and the Controller General, the Delaware State Housing Authority is authorized to transfer funds among these
appropriations to maximize housing opportunities in the State.


DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY AND INFORMATION
Section 53. Data Center Projects. In no instance shall any information technology data center project be
initiated by a department/agency during this fiscal year until a formalized plan has been approved by the
department/agency head, Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Chief Information Officer. This
includes, but is not limited to, relocating, renovating and/or constructing new information technology data centers.


DEPARTMENT OF STATE
Section 54. Museum Maintenance. Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an appropriation to the
Department of State for museum maintenance. It is the intent of the General Assembly that these funds be retained by
the Department of State, Division of Historical and Cultural Affairs for use with the operations of state museums or
for repairs to those facilities grounds, lands, and buildings under the control of the Division of Historical and Cultural
Affairs; and/or for the purchase of any equipment necessary to facilitate those repairs.
Section 55. Library Construction. Proposals submitted by the Department of State to the Office of
Management and Budget under 29 Del. C. § 6604A shall include a statement as to whether or not each of the libraries
have the required 50 percent non-state share match as defined in 29 Del. C. § 6602A(2).
Section 56. Library Construction Review. Up to $50,000 of any Library Construction project as defined
in 29 Del. C. c. 66A shall be allocated to the Division of Libraries for the purpose of reviewing technology, workflow
and space planning to enable public libraries to meet standards established by the Division of Libraries with the
approval of the Council on Libraries. Pursuant to 29 Del. C. c. 66A, public libraries shall be responsible for 50
percent of the costs (not to exceed $25,000).
Section 57. Stabilization Endowment for the Arts. It is the intent of the General Assembly that
previously appropriated funds from the Department of State to the Stabilization Endowment for the Arts may be used
to fund operating expenses pursuant to appropriate controls and procedures adopted by the Board of the Arts
Consortium of Delaware and upon concurrence of the Division of Arts.
Section 58. Historic Preservation Tax Credits. Notwithstanding the provisions in 30 Del. C. §1816, the
maximum amount of new Historic Preservation Tax Credits awarded under the provisions of 30 Del. C. c. 18
Subchapter II shall not exceed $8,000,000 for the Fiscal Years 2025 – 2030 2026 – 2031.
Section 59. Historic Tax Credits. Amend §1816, Title 30 of the Delaware Code by making
deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows:
§ 1816. Total amount of credits permitted in each fiscal year; allocation of such credits.
(a) The maximum amount of new credit awards under this chapter in any fiscal year shall not exceed
$5,000,000 $8,000,000. One hundred thousand dollars of the credit awards in a fiscal year must be reserved for
distribution to qualified resident curators. If in any fiscal year there are insufficient qualified resident curators
to exhaust this allotment, the unused credit amount will be available in the next fiscal year for award to persons
qualifying under § 1813(a)(1) or (2) of this title. In any 1 year, $1,500,000 of tax credits shall be reserved for


projects receiving a credit of not more than $300,000. In addition, in any 1 year, $1,500,000 of tax credits shall
be reserved for projects located in Downtown Development Districts, of which $500,000 shall be reserved for
projects in such districts receiving a credit of not more than $300,000. On April 1 of each year, any unused
balance of the foregoing pools of tax credits shall be available to any eligible project. However, should a credit
award exceed the actual credit claimed, the amount of the excess credit award shall not be available for a
subsequent award.
(b) The Division of Historical and Cultural Affairs shall award any unused credits from the
immediately preceding two Fiscal Years to qualified projects that have received a Certificate of Completion
and complied with all other applicable requirements of the program.
(c) Beginning on June 30, 2025, the Division of Historical and Cultural Affairs shall award such
unused credits if there are insufficient credits available to award to qualified projects in that Fiscal Year.
(bd) The State Office shall ensure that the date and time of Stage II approval is noted on the first page
of the application. Credits will be awarded in chronological order based upon the date and time on which each
application receives Stage II approval from the State Office. If a credit award would result in an excedence of
the $5,000,000 limitation for the fiscal year in which it is awarded, the amount by which such credit award
exceeds $5,000,000 shall carry over to the succeeding fiscal year and shall receive priority for that year.
(ce) All applicants must begin construction on the approved Stage II rehabilitation plan within 1 year
of receiving the Stage II approval. If construction on the rehabilitation plan is not substantially commenced
and diligently pursued within this time period, the applicant will forfeit the awarded credits, and the credits
awarded to such applicant will become available for award to other applicants.
(df) Upon completion of the rehabilitation or, if applicable, phase thereof, the applicant shall obtain a
Certificate of Completion from the Delaware State Historic Preservation Officer in accordance with § 1815 of
this title. The applicant shall then take the necessary Title 30 - State Taxes procedures to claim the state tax
credit in accordance with this chapter. However, no such claim for state tax credit shall be made prior to the 1-
year anniversary of receipt of the Stage II approval from the State Office.
(eg) The Secretary of Finance shall report to the Governor and the General Assembly on the second
Tuesday of every January concerning the amount of tax credits awarded pursuant to this subchapter for the
previous fiscal year.


(fh) On or before January 31 of every year, the Division of Historical and Cultural Affairs of the
Department of State shall issue an annual report on the restoration and rehabilitation status of all tax credit projects
approved during the previous calendar year. The annual report will also include a list of all tax credit projects issued
in previous years which have a balance of credits which have not been claimed. The annual report shall be distributed
to the Governor and the General Assembly.
Section 60. Composites Research. The Division of Small Business is authorized to provide a match of up
to $100,000 to the University of Delaware Center for Composite Materials for federal research grants received that
support the development and application of composite manufacturing technology for the benefit of Delaware
companies. Such match shall be disbursed from the Delaware Strategic Fund upon documentation of the receipt of
federal funds allocated to the center during the fiscal year for these purposes and upon documentation of the
relevance of these research projects to Delaware industries’ needs and their participation within said projects.
Section 61. Kalmar Nyckel. The scheduling of the Kalmar Nyckel by non-state entities shall require the
approval of the Riverfront Development Corporation of Delaware (RDC). Further, the RDC is encouraged to enter
into negotiations with interested parties to review the disposition of loans to the Kalmar Nyckel.
Section 62. Council on Development Finance. If the Division of Small Business makes an award not in
agreement with the recommendations of the Council on Development Finance, the Director of the Division of Small
Business shall notify the Co-Chairs of the Joint Committee on Capital Improvements within 10 business days. The
notification shall include details of the actual award, the Council recommendations on the proposal and a justification
for why the Division of Small Business did not follow the recommendations of the Council.
Section 63. New Markets Tax Credit Program. In the event that the Director of the Division of Small
Business and the Secretary of Finance determine that it is advisable to apply for participation in the New Markets Tax
Credit Program under the U.S. Treasury Department, the Director is authorized to form a business entity or
organization to apply for and manage this program on behalf of the State, as required by applicable federal legislation
and regulations. Any such application for said program shall be subject to the approval of the Co-Chairs of the Joint
Committee on Capital Improvements and the Delaware State Clearinghouse Committee. Should such application
receive final approval by the U.S. Treasury Department or other federal governmental entity charged with such
authority, at least one public hearing shall be held for the purpose of presenting the program, the availability of
financial assistance, and the selection process.


Section 64. Riverfront Development Corporation. (a) Funds appropriated for the RDC shall be disbursed
to a special fund to be known as the Riverfront Development Corporation Fund hereinafter referred to as the Fund.
(b) The Fund shall be invested by the State Treasurer in securities consistent with the policies established by
the Cash Management Policy Board. All monies generated by the Fund shall be deposited in the Fund.
(c) Funds appropriated to the Division of Small Business for RDC shall be expended only with the approval
of the Board of Directors of RDC. Funds may only be expended for activities related to the redevelopment of the
Brandywine and Christina riverfront areas, including: planning and design studies; the acquisition, construction and
improvement of real property; environmental remediation; costs of operations and administration; debt service; and
other expenses in furtherance of the mission of RDC. On October 1 of each year the RDC will submit a report to the
Division of Small Business which will outline how the funds awarded in the previous fiscal year were utilized. This
report will also outline and explain the RDC’s request for funding for the next fiscal year.
(d) The RDC is authorized to expend funds and utilize staff to support the operations of the Delaware
Stadium Corporation (DSC) in furtherance of a long-term commitment to minor league baseball at Frawley Stadium.
Section 65. Limited Investment for Financial Traction (LIFT) and Delaware Rural Irrigation
Program (DRIP) Initiatives. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the Division of Small Business is
hereby authorized to pay administrative fees associated with LIFT and DRIP Initiatives from the Delaware Strategic
Fund not to exceed 2 two percent of the program total.
Section 66. Innovation Centers. The Division of Small Business shall utilize the Delaware Strategic Fund
to encourage and invite proposals targeted at innovation to support the establishment or expansion of one or more
Innovation Centers. The mission of the Innovation Center(s) shall be creation of wealth by new and growing high
tech businesses in Delaware that have global impact. The innovation process shall involve assisting in the
identification of new product and process ideas that will succeed and the means of taking these new ideas to market.
The Center(s) will facilitate the marrying of the resources of Delaware’s labor force, academic institutions and
technical resources to the expertise of a select group of entrepreneurs who understand opportunity, as well as the
means to develop it.
Section 67. Cultural Access Fund. The Department of State is hereby authorized to use funds reserved in
the Cultural Access Fund in order to help fund a matching grant program for capital projects and related programs
that will enhance the quality of availability of Delaware’s recreational and cultural offerings. Funds disbursed as part
of this matching grant program must be matched 2:1 to state funds. In the event the grant recipient does not have


funds to support match requirement, the Department may submit a request to the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General for approval to waive said requirement.
Section 68. Business Development Allocation. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Division of
Small Business is authorized to utilize a portion of the funds allocated in the Section 1 Addendum of this Act to the
Delaware Strategic Fund to reimburse no more than 3 three percent of capital expenditures made by a commercial
developer who is undergoing a construction project that will cost at least $75,000,000 and result in the creation of at
least 500 new jobs. Before funding can be allocated, the project must be reviewed by the Council on Development
Finance and the Director of the Division of Small Business must submit written justification to the Director of the
Office of Management and Budget and the Co-Chairs of the Joint Committee on Capital Improvements.
Section 69. Small Business Financial Development Fund. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
Division of Small Business is authorized to use up to $1,750,000 $5,000,000 of the funds allocated in the Section 1
Addendum of this Act to the Delaware Strategic Fund in order to help support programs that provide financial
assistance to further the development of small businesses in the state. Any programming that is to be allocated
funding shall first be reviewed by the Council on Development Finance.
Section 70. Historical and Cultural Affairs. (a) The Secretary of State is authorized to waive the
provisions of Chapter 69 of Title 29 of the Delaware Code to rapidly complete restoration and maintenance projects
for historic buildings and/or historic sites that the Secretary of State deems critical and/or are threatened by rapid
deterioration. Requirements contained in 29 Del. C. § 6960 shall remain in effect.
(b) The Secretary of State is authorized to waive the provisions of Chapters 5, 94 and 95 of Title 29 of the
Delaware Code in order to sell, transfer, or acquire historic buildings and sites. Any properties which are transferred
shall be subject to an easement designed to protect the historical nature of the historic building or site.
Section 71. Laboratory Space and Laboratory Space Development Fund. Section 1 Addendum of
this Act makes an appropriation of $5,000,000 to Department of State for Laboratory Space. Funds appropriated for
Laboratory Space shall be disbursed to a special fund to be known as the Laboratory Space Development Fund,
hereinafter referred to as the Fund. The purpose of the Fund is to provide grants and other financial assistance to
directly support the acquisition and expansion of high-quality modern laboratory space for business use and research
in the State. The Division of Small Business shall administer the Fund and distribution of any awards from the Fund.
Any laboratory space proposal that is to be allocated funding from the Fund shall first be reviewed and approved by
the Council on Development Finance.


Section 72. Transfer of Economic Development Funds. Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes
appropriations to the Delaware Strategic Fund, Site Readiness Fund and Laboratory Space. Upon request from the
Chairperson of the Delaware Economic Development Authority, and approval from the Director of Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General, the Division of Small Business is authorized to transfer funds
among these appropriations in order to maximize economic development opportunities in the State.
Section 73. Delaware Grocery Initiative. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Division of
Small Business is authorized to use up to $1,000,000 of the funds allocated in the Section 1 Addendum of this
Act to the Delaware Strategic Fund in order to support the Delaware Grocery Initiative established by Senate
Substitute 1 for Senate Bill 254 of the 152nd General Assembly.


DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE
Section 74. Bond Proceeds Reimbursement. Unless not permitted by the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
as amended (the Code), whenever the General Assembly authorizes the issuance of the State’s General Obligation
bonds or the Delaware Transportation Authority’s (the Authority) revenue bonds to finance the costs of specific
capital projects, it is the intent of the General Assembly that the interest on such bonds shall not be included in gross
income for federal income tax purposes under Section 103 of the Code, and the United States Treasury Regulations
(the Regulations) thereunder as they may be promulgated from time to time, or shall be qualified as Build America
Bonds pursuant to the Code and the Regulations. Pursuant to the State's budget and financial policies, other than
unexpected situations where surplus revenues render bond financing unnecessary or undesirable, no funds other than
the proceeds of such bonds, are or are reasonably expected to be, reserved, allocated on a long-term basis or
otherwise set aside by the State to pay the costs of such specific capital projects. Pursuant to the Authority’s budget
and financial policies, it is expected that approximately 50 percent of the costs of its capital projects shall be funded
on a long-term basis from the proceeds of such bonds. However, after the authorization of such bonds, but prior to
their issuance, non-bond funds from the State’s General Fund or the Authority’s Transportation Trust Fund or other
funds may be advanced on a temporary basis to pay a portion of the costs of such specific capital projects. In that
event, it is expected that these non-bond funds will be reimbursed from the proceeds of such bonds when they are
issued. This reimbursement may cause a portion of such bonds to become reimbursement bonds within the meaning
of Section 1.150-2 of the Regulations. Under those Regulations, to preserve the exclusion of the interest on such
bonds from gross income for federal income tax purposes, it may be necessary to make a declaration of official intent.
The Secretary of Finance is hereby designated as the appropriate representative of the State and the Secretary of
Transportation is hereby designated as the appropriate representative of the Authority, and each is authorized to
declare official intent on behalf of the State or the Authority, as the case may be, within the meaning of Section
1.150-2 of the Regulations, whenever and to the extent that such declaration is required to preserve such tax
treatment.
Section 75. Amortization Requirements. Issuance of any bonds authorized in this Act or any previous
authorization act may be subject to any amortization requirements as shall be determined by the bond issuing officers
notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in 29 Del. C. § 7406(b).
Section 76. Diamond State Port Corporation. The State Treasurer is authorized to and shall take custody
of certain reserve funds belonging to and transferred by the Diamond State Port Corporation (DSPC). The


Department of Finance, Office of the Secretary (25-01-01) shall establish and maintain a special fund with the State
Treasurer on behalf of DSPC for the purpose of accounting for the receipt and disbursement of the reserve funds.
The reserve funds shall be invested with other State funds in accordance with the guidelines established by the Cash
Management Policy Board. The special fund shall receive interest at the school and special fund rate approved by the
Cash Management Policy Board. The State Treasurer shall release custody of the reserve funds upon receipt of
disbursement requests approved by the Department of Finance.
Section 77. Port of Wilmington. Notwithstanding § 8784 and Chapter 69 of Title 29, the provisions of
House Concurrent Resolution No. 76 (149th General Assembly) authorizing the Concession Agreement or any
provision of Delaware law to the contrary, the Diamond State Port Corporation, with the subsequent concurrence of
the co-chairs of the Bond and Capital Improvement Committee, the Controller General, the President Pro Tempore of
the Senate, and the Speaker of the House, shall have the authority to amend the Concession Agreement and/or enter
into a new concession agreement(s) in furtherance of the policy and purposes under § 8780 of Title 29.


DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTION
Section 78. Prison Construction. (a) The Director of the Office of Management and Budget, as provided
through construction management services, shall consult with the Commissioner of Correction to ensure expedient
programming, planning, and construction of authorized correctional facilities. None of the funds authorized herein or
in prior fiscal years are intended to supplant federal funds.
(b) Use of any federal grant funds awarded and approved by the Delaware State Clearinghouse Committee
for the purpose of constructing correctional facilities shall have the technical oversight of the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget as defined in the appropriate section of this Act pertaining to management of the
construction to ensure proper use and timely completion of all such construction projects authorized herein.
Section 79. Community Restoration. The Department of Correction may, to the extent resources and
appropriately classified offenders are available, direct these offenders to assist with community restoration projects.
These projects may include beautification, clean up and restoration efforts requested by civic, governmental, and
fraternal organizations approved by the Commissioner.
Section 80. Maintenance and Restoration. Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an appropriation to the
Department of Correction for Maintenance and Restoration projects. The department must submit a bi-annual report
to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General, detailing the expenditure of such
funds and the respective projects. The department shall submit a preliminary plan to the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General for maintenance projects for the following fiscal year by October
31.
Section 81. James T. Vaughn Correctional Center. The Section 1 Addendum makes an appropriation to
the Office of Management and Budget for the James T. Vaughn Correctional Center (JTVCC) HVAC Project. These
funds shall be used to address the HVAC needs throughout the facility. The Commissioner of Correction shall work
with the Sustainable Energy Utility to further address any necessary energy projects at JTVCC.


DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES AND ENVIRONMENTAL CONTROL
Section 82. Conservation Cost-Sharing Program. Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an
appropriation to the Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control (DNREC) for the Conservation
Cost-Sharing Program. Of this amount, $2,000,000 at 70 percent will be divided equally among the three
conservation districts to expand their water quality and water management programs. Preference should be given to
projects or conservation practices that improve water quality on lands covered by nutrient management plans, as
practicable and in consultation with the Secretary. The remaining 30 percent balance of the $2,000,000 will be
directed towards nutrient management and water quality efforts statewide as determined by the Secretary, in
consultation with the three conservation districts. The remaining balance of $1,200,000 will be directed toward
DNREC Division of Watershed Stewardship conservation priorities to match Federal and State funds to achieve
Delaware WIP goals by implementing priority best management practices.
Section 83. DNREC Land Acquisition. Except for land acquired by approval of the Open Space Council
or approved through a Bond and Capital Improvements Act, land shall not be purchased by DNREC without prior
approval of the Co-Chairs of the Joint Committee on Capital Improvements provided, however, that the Department
is not prohibited from conducting studies, surveys, or other contractual arrangements that would normally precede
land acquisition procedures.
Section 84. Army Corps of Engineers Project Cooperation Agreements. By using funds approved by
Bond and Capital Improvements Acts, the Secretary of DNREC is authorized to sign Project Cooperation
Agreements with the Department of the Army and other appropriate sponsors for planning, construction, operation,
and maintenance for projects entered into by said Agreements.
Section 85. Indian River Marina. In accordance with the provisions of 73 Del. Laws, c. 350, § 70,
DNREC, under the direction of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget may utilize up to $9,900,000 in
funds from the Twenty-First Century Fund for the Parks Endowment Account as established in 29 Del. C. §
6102A(e), for the purpose of revitalizing and enhancing public amenities within the Delaware Seashore State Park in
and around the Indian River Marina complex and related support facilities as presented to the Joint Committee on
Capital Improvements Program on May 15, 2002. DNREC will repay both the principal borrowed and interest on the
principal borrowed equal to that interest lost as a result of borrowing from the account. Repayment shall not exceed
20 years.


Section 86. Newark Reservoir. Regardless of whether New Castle County retains, or if the City of
Newark annexes the property referred to as New Castle County Tax Parcel Number 08-059.20-002 and Tax Parcel
Number 08-059.20-001, this property is prohibited from any commercial or more intense residential development that
would require a rezoning of the property.
Section 87. Seventh Street Marina. It is the intent of the General Assembly to classify the Seventh Street
Marina, located on East Seventh Street, being Tax Parcel Number 26-044.00-013 containing 7.86 acres of land (of
which 5.27 acres, more or less, is above the high water line) as existing marina for purposes of the State of Delaware
Marina Regulations, adopted on March 29, 1990 and amended on February 22, 1993. Such classification does not
exempt any person seeking to make physical improvements to the marina from permit application fees pursuant to 7
Del. C. c. 66 and c. 72.
Section 88. Waterway Management. DNREC is directed to provide dedicated, comprehensive waterway
management for state waters. DNREC will maintain design depths and mark navigational channels of the State that
are not maintained and marked by any entity of the federal government; remove nuisance macroalgae; remove
abandoned vessels; remove derelict structures, trees, and other debris that threaten safe navigation; and perform any
other waterway management services that may be identified to preserve, maintain, and enhance recreational use of
the State’s waters, as well as improve environmental conditions as warranted or directed by the Governor or
Secretary of DNREC. DNREC is further directed to undertake a study of the sediment sources and patterns of
sediment movement that result in deposition within state waterways to determine if there are methods to reduce the
dependency on dredging to remove deposited sediments. DNREC shall provide a report of the projects, priority
rankings, and timelines for completion of the dredging, navigation, and channel marking related projects within the
Inland Bays to the Joint Committee on Capital Improvements by September 1st of each year.
Section 89. Auburn Valley Project. The implementation of the transportation, stormwater management,
demolition, remediation, redevelopment, and parks and recreation element of the Auburn Valley Master Plan shall
not be subject to the zoning, subdivision, land use, or building code ordinances or regulations of New Castle County.
The Auburn Valley Master Plan shall be limited to: any parcels owned by the State of Delaware as part of Auburn
Valley State Park; and the following privately owned parcels as identified in the New Castle County property records
if there is an approved redevelopment agreement with DNREC: 08-004.00-267; 08-004.00-273; 08-004.00-274; 08-
004.00-275; 08-001.00-025; 08-001.00-027; 08-001.00-023; 08-004.00-272; 08-004.00-270; 08-004.00-309 through
08-004.00-352; 08-004.00-278 through 08-004.00-308; 08-008.10-068 through 08-008.10-137; and 08-001.00-026.


DNREC will review new AVMP redevelopment projects with New Castle County, will develop a transition plan and
timeline for land use decisions of Auburn Valley Master Plan properties to return to New Castle County, and will
deliver a report to the members of the Joint Committee on Capital Improvement by April 1, 2026.
Section 90. Conservation District Contracting. Notwithstanding any statutory provision or regulation to
the contrary, it is the intent of the General Assembly that DNREC may enlist Delaware’s conservation districts as
provided in 7 Del. C. c. 39 to advance the purposes of this chapter. All contracts shall be subject to the provisions of
29 Del. C. § 6960.
Section 91. Bay View. The New Castle Conservation District shall continue coordinating with New Castle
County’s Office of Emergency Services to work with the Bay View community as Resource Conservation and
Development (RC&D) funds drainage project and may use up to $200,000 from existing RC&D project funds should
the opportunity arise to fund an appropriate solution. For the purposes of Bay View, appropriate solutions may
include, but are not limited to, matching the $200,000 in RC&D project funds with FEMA funding as a County-
sponsored Hazard Mitigation Project.
Section 92. Redevelopment of Strategic Site. Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an appropriation to
DNREC for the redevelopment of the following strategic site:
The Fort DuPont complex adjacent to Delaware City. Up to $400,000 of this appropriation may be utilized
for the operations and administration of the redevelopment corporation. Notwithstanding the provisions of 29 Del C.
c. 94 and upon request by the redevelopment corporation board pursuant to a duly authorized resolution, the Director
of the Office of Management and Budget may transfer real property of the Fort DuPont/Governor Bacon Complex to
the redevelopment corporation.
Section 93. Resource, Conservation and Development Projects. It is the intent of the General Assembly
that the Office of Natural Resources, Division of Watershed Stewardship and the Conservation District(s) as
established by 7 Del. C. c. 39 shall have the following authorities:
(a) Within the same county, funds appropriated in any fiscal year shall be used for the completion of any
Resource, Conservation and Development (RC&D) project approved by the Joint Committee on Capital
Improvements. Funds remaining from completed projects may be utilized for any project approved as part of any
fiscal year Bond and Capital Improvements Act. The funds appropriated are to be utilized for planning, surveying,
engineering, and construction of approved projects.


(b) For water management and drainage projects undertaken by DNREC, Office of Natural Resources,
Division of Watershed Stewardship and the Conservation Districts using RC&D Resource, Conservation and
Development funds, the required non-RC&D match shall be a minimum of 10 percent of the total project cost for any
project.
(c) Approved projects remain on the approved project list until completed or discontinued by the Division of
Watershed Stewardship or Conservation District(s) because of engineering, landowner consent or other issues that
render a cost-effective solution to drainage or flooding problems unlikely. The projects recommended to be
discontinued will be identified on the annual report submitted to the Joint Committee on Capital Improvements.
(d) In December and May of each year, the Division of Watershed Stewardship shall submit a financial
report of fund activity including expenditures by fiscal year appropriated for each county to the Office of
Management and Budget and the Office of the Controller General. Accounting and financial management for the
RC&D fund will be based on the current pro-rated allocation of funds for each county and not based on specific
project allocations.
(e) The Division of Watershed Stewardship will submit an annual report to the Joint Committee on Capital
Improvements at the Resource, Conservation and Development hearing detailing project status including those
projects recommended for discontinuation. The annual report will also include a request for funding that will identify
the total unexpended balance of the fund and the total projected needs of the project estimates to date. A list of new
projects will also be identified and submitted for approval by the Joint Committee on Capital Improvements.
(f) When a proposed tax ditch project or other water management project traverses county lines, if approved
by the Joint Committee on Capital Improvements the project shall be added to the project list in both counties.
(g) Subject to the approval of the Co-Chairs of the Joint Committee on Capital Improvements, a project
funded entirely from Community Transportation Funds may be added to the RC&D project list during the course of a
fiscal year when said project is deemed to be an emergency project affecting the health and safety of residents.
Section 94. Revenues. Prior to requesting the General Assembly approve fee changes for any
program or fee administered by the Department of Natural Resources, the Department must first complete the
following;
(1) Conduct an analysis of the Department’s costs to administer such permits, licenses,
approvals, or services provided in relation to the funds including fees, non-appropriated special funds,


general funds or other funding that are collected and used in connection with the permit, license,
approval, service or program.
(2) Perform a continuous improvement lean process study and implement any procedural and
other improvements to the subject permitting, licensing, approval, service or program to increase
efficiency, shorten permitting time frames, improve community engagement and outreach, and
minimize or avoid any fee increases.
(3) Provide for review and comment from any applicable advisory committee or, in the
absence of an advisory committee, a balanced group of stakeholders who utilize the permit, license,
approval, service, or program and are impacted by the regulated activities).
The Department shall include the results of its analysis along with any proposed fee increases and explain
how an increase will approximate and reasonably reflect on those costs necessary to defray the expenses of each
permit, license, approval, or related service.
(a) The Governor and General Assembly herein acknowledges that certain programs within the department
are funded all or in part by fee-based revenues as specified in the appropriate chapter of the Delaware Code. The
Secretary shall perform a review of fees assessed and collected by the department to determine the revenue
sufficiency of the fees and programs they support, and a report shall be submitted to the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General on January 1, 2025, during the Department’s budgetary process
for FY2026 and every two years thereafter. The review shall identify program elements that are funded through fees
and other sources and shall include an evaluation of effectiveness and efficiency. The review may include, but is not
limited to, identification of operational changes that improve efficiency and effectiveness of operations and reduce
costs. The Secretary shall provide stakeholders and individuals familiar with the program opportunity to review and
provide comment on the department’s findings. Any changes in fees that require the approval of the General
Assembly shall be submitted by the department as part of the annual budgetary process.
(b) DNREC’s Division of Parks and Recreation, following adequate opportunity for public
comment and the approval of the Parks and Recreation Advisory Council and the Secretary, may establish, for
activities, entrance fees and services administered by the division, such appropriate fees as shall approximate
and reasonably reflect costs necessary to defray the expenses of each such activities or service. There may be a
separate fee charged for each service or activity, but no fee shall be charged for a purpose not specified in the
appropriate chapter of the Delaware Code. At the beginning of each calendar year, the department shall


compute the appropriate fees for each separate activity or service and provide to the Governor, Office of
Management and Budget, and Controller General. All revenue generated by any of the activities or services
performed by the department shall be deposited in the appropriated special fund account. These funds shall be
used to defray the expenses of the department but may not exceed the budget authority for any fiscal year.
Section 95. Clean Water Initiative. Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an appropriation to Clean
Water State Revolving Fund. At least $4,600,000 of these funds shall be used for the development, administration
and implementation of a clean water financing program to benefit low-income and traditionally underserved
communities through lower interest rates and affordability grants.
Section 96. Buried Debris Pit Remediation Program. Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an
appropriation of $1,000,000 to the Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control for Debris Pits, New
Castle County shall match the state appropriation.
Section 97. Ogletown Trail. For purposes of creating and maintaining public-use trails in the Ogletown
area, the Secretary of the Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control is hereby directed to enter into
an easement agreement with the property owners of parcels with Tax IDs 11-003.30-049 and 09-028.00-009 located
on East Chestnut Hill Road in Newark. Upon entering into an easement agreement for public access, the department
shall allocate $500,000 of its Park Facility Rehab and Public Recreational Infrastructure appropriation for the creation
and maintenance of trails, and enter into an agreement with a third-party organization related to easement monitoring,
trail development and maintenance, and habitat protection and restoration.
Section 98. Polly Drummond Yard Waste. Pursuant to 83 Del. Laws Chapter 340, the Department of
Natural Resources and Environmental Control has worked with members of the General Assembly to pursue a
permanent solution for relocation of the Polly Drummond Yard Waste Site and ensure New Castle County residents
have a safe and accessible drop-off site. The department shall work with the Delaware Solid Waste Authority
(DSWA) to transition operations under DSWA in the vicinity of the current Polly Drummond Yard Waste Site.
DNREC and DSWA will provide a status report back to the General Assembly and Governor by December 1 of each
fiscal year with a plan to address the alternative yard waste drop-off plan.
Section 99. Delaware Bay Beach Initiative. The Section 1 Addendum of this Act appropriates 84 Del.
Laws c. 83 and 84 Del. Laws c. 297 appropriated funds for the Delaware Bay Beach Initiative. These funds shall be
used to provide the required 10 percent state match to leverage federal funds to ensure the completion of
renourishment projects for Delaware’s bay beaches.


Section 100. Tax Ditches. (a) Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an appropriation to the
Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control (DNREC) for Tax Ditches. Of this amount,
$1,500,000 $1,148,700 shall be retained by the DNREC Division of Watershed Stewardship to support and
facilitate the Tax Ditch Program. The remaining balance shall be divided at a rate based on the total number of
miles of tax ditches statewide and distributed to the three conservation districts based on the number of miles
of tax ditches in each county. This funding shall be used for tax ditch maintenance work to be completed at the
direction of the tax ditch organizations and/or their managers who are in compliance with 7 Del. C. c. 41.
(b) As the drainage and prevention of flooding and management of water for resource conservation is
considered a public benefit and conducive to public health, safety, and welfare, and as tax ditch organizations
operate under the supervision of DNREC, the Division of Watershed Stewardship shall have authority to act on
behalf of “inactive tax ditches,” defined as tax ditch organizations with zero (0) tax ditch officers for at least
one (1) year. The DNREC Division of Watershed Stewardship shall have full exercising powers, roles,
responsibilities, and duties of a tax ditch officer as granted in Title 7 Chapter 41 Drainage of Lands and
Management of Waters; Tax Ditches. The DNREC Division of Watershed Stewardship shall have the ability to
make and execute necessary maintenance activities on behalf of the tax ditch organization, and the DNREC
Division of Watershed Stewardship shall be granted access to the inactive tax ditch funds. The authority for the
DNREC Division of Watershed Stewardship to act on behalf of an inactive tax ditch shall be at the DNREC
Division of Watershed Stewardship's discretion, prioritized based on need, and expires upon the fulfillment of
an officer vacancy. The DNREC Division of Watershed Stewardship will continue to implement recruitment
strategies to obtain tax ditch officers for managing inactive tax ditches.
Section 101. Park Facility Rehab and Public Recreational Infrastructure. Section 1 Addendum
of this Act makes an appropriation to the Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control for
Park Facility Rehab and Public Recreational Infrastructure. Of this amount, $750,000 shall be used toward
improvements at the Brandywine Zoo to support accreditation efforts; $776,277 shall be used toward
improvements and ADA compliance needs at Bellevue State Park; and $1,000,000 shall be used toward the
splash pad and enhancements at Trap Pond State Park.
Section 102. Atlas Point Facility Community Air Monitoring. The Department of Natural
Resources and Environmental Control (DNREC) will provide recommendations to the Joint Committee on
Capital Improvements by April 1, 2026, regarding the implementation of community air quality monitoring


near the Atlas Point Facility. DNREC’s recommendations will be informed by community air monitoring
studies, analysis of emerging air sensor technology, and feedback from the communities surrounding the Atlas
Point Facility.
Section 103. Community Air Quality Monitoring. Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an
appropriation to the Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control for Community Air Quality
Monitoring. This amount shall be used to help fund the installation of air monitors in the community around
Delaware City, along with the creation of community outreach and reporting tools by the Clean Air Council.
Section 104. Little Assawoman Shoal. Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an appropriation to
the Department of Natural Resources and Environmental Control for Shoreline and Waterway Management.
Of these funds, $475,000 shall be used for dredging of the Little Assawoman Shoal.


DEPARTMENT OF SAFETY AND HOMELAND SECURITY
Section 105. New Castle County Regional Training Facility. (a) Notwithstanding any provision or
requirement of the public trust doctrine or 10 Del. C. c. 62, and without the necessity of compliance therewith, New
Castle County is hereby authorized to utilize 40 acres, more or less, at 1205 River Road, New Castle, Delaware
19720, Tax Parcel Number 10-046.00-001, for the sole purpose of establishing and maintaining a law enforcement
firing range, and driving course thereon for use by federal, State of Delaware, New Castle County and local
municipal law enforcement personnel.
(b) Section 1 Addendum of 79 Del. Laws, c. 78 and c. 292 appropriated funding for the New Castle County
Law Enforcement Firing Range. Said funding may be expended for portable equipment that will be utilized for the
range upon opening of the facility.
Section 106. Marijuana Social Equity Business Development Fund. The Section 1 Addendum of
this Act appropriates funding 84 Del. Laws c. 297 appropriated funds for the Social Equity Fund. These funds
shall be used by the Office of the Marijuana Commissioner to provide grants to applicants that have qualified
under the requirements found in 4 Del. C. and have received a conditional license. Grants may be used to pay
for ordinary and necessary expenses required to start and operate a marijuana establishment.
Beginning July 1, 2025, the Marijuana Commissioner shall publish online and send to the Governor,
the Chief Clerk of the House, and the Secretary of the Senate an annual report on the following:
(1) The number of persons or businesses receiving financial assistance from the Fund.
(2) the amount in financial assistance awarded in the aggregate and the number of grants awarded.


DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Section 107. General Provisions. The Department of Transportation (Department) is hereby authorized
and directed to use all its designated powers and resources to carry out the following legislative mandates:
(a) Transportation Trust Fund Authorizations. Sums not to exceed $774,842,681 $653,705,105 (State:
$328,702,090 $212,616,463; Federal: $404,747,357 $397,793,988; Other $41,393,234 $43,294,654) are authorized to
be withdrawn from the Transportation Trust Fund to carry out the projects and programs as set forth in the Section 1
Addendum of this Act.
(b) New Transportation Trust Fund Debt Authorization. To fund a portion of the projects authorized herein,
the Delaware Transportation Authority is hereby authorized to issue bonds in an amount not to exceed $160,160,258
$26,741,437 pursuant to the provisions of 2 Del. C. c. 13 and 14, of which not more than $150,000,000 $25,000,000
plus premium shall be used for purposes set forth in the Section 1 Addendum of this Act with the remainder, not to
exceed $10,160,258 $1,741,437 to be used to fund issuance costs and necessary reserves for the Reserve Account.
Section 108. Maintenance and Operations Facilities. Building structures and facilities constructed, or to
be constructed, within the Department of Transportation's operating right of way that facilitate maintaining the
highway system and are used to assist in the operational and maintenance activities for all roads, shall not be subject
to zoning, subdivision, or building code ordinances or regulations by any political subdivision of the State. Types of
structures may include equipment sheds, crew quarters, equipment maintenance, equipment washing, material storage
sheds (i.e. salt, sand and other bulk materials), fuel centers, and other maintenance structures required to maintain the
highway system such as security (cameras and fences) including necessary maintenance and replacement items such
as upgrades to existing facilities. The Department shall not construct any such facility without first conducting a
public workshop to describe such plans and gather public input into the effect of such plans.
Section 109. Grants and Allocations Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an appropriation for projects
within the Grants and Allocations classification. The General Assembly further defines its intent with response to
those appropriations as follows:
(a) The sum of $67,680,000 $67,541,223 (State/Other), of which $1,530,000 $1,500,000 is categorized as
Drainage Funds, shall be used for the Community Transportation Fund (CTF), in accordance with the rules and
regulations adopted by the Joint Committee on Capital Improvements, as amended from time to time.
(b) The sum of $6,000,000 (State) shall be used for the Municipal Street Aid program pursuant to the
provisions of 30 Del. C. c. 51.


(c) Of the funds appropriated in subsection (a), $30,000,000 shall be used by the Department to continue
the Subdivision Street Pavement Management Fund (SSPMF), which replaces the previous Subdivision Street Pilot
Paving Program. The Department is directed to only use these funds for direct paving and rehabilitation of
community streets. The Department is further directed to use its existing road rating criteria as a basis to determine
the priority of paving and rehabilitating community streets. The Department will provide a monthly report to the Co-
Chairs of the Joint Committee on Capital Improvements on the progress of the program.
Section 110. 5310 Program. The Delaware Transit Corporation is authorized to expend up to $1,200,245
$573,245 (State portion $741,649, Federal portion $458,596) from the Transit System classification (97301)
appropriated in this Act for the 5310 Program, administered by the Federal Transit Administration
Section 111. Department Work Impacts on Private Property and its Owners. When the Department
and/or any of its contractors determines that it would be in the best interests of the State to undertake
construction/reconstruction work past 9:00 p.m. or before 7:00 a.m., and such work is to be conducted immediately
adjacent to a residential neighborhood:
(a) The Department shall first ensure that residents of the neighborhood are notified in a timely fashion of
the Department’s desire to undertake such work. It must explain the benefits and costs to the State and the
neighborhood of working under regular hours and the proposed extended hour schedule. Such notifications shall
include a description of the proposed work to be conducted, the proposed use of any equipment that may cause noise,
vibration, or odor disruptions to the neighborhood and an estimate of the time required to complete the project. The
Department may proceed with its extended hours of work if it does not receive a significant number of objections
from the notified residents. Pursuant to the provisions of the Delaware Code, it shall offer temporary relocation to
any residents who request such relocation.
(b) The Department may proceed with its extended hours of work, so long as jack hammering or other high
noise activities do not impose an excessive nuisance to residents within the designated work zone.
(c) If the Department determines that the proposed work (regardless of its scheduled time) will produce
noise that exceeds the applicable noise ordinances of the appropriate jurisdiction, the Department shall ensure that it
seeks and receives a waiver from that jurisdiction before commencing the work.
(d) If the Department determines that the proposed work may cause any vibration or other damage to
neighboring property, it shall complete a pre-work survey of the potentially affected properties to determine the base-
line condition of those properties. It shall monitor the properties during construction to ensure that any vibration or


other damage is minimized. If any damage does occur, the Department must reimburse the private property owners
pursuant to the provisions of the Delaware Code. The Secretary of the Department (Secretary) may waive the
provisions of this section if he/she determines that any such work is necessary in order to respond effectively to an
emergency caused by a natural disaster, an accident or a failure of a transportation investment.
Section 112. City of Wilmington Beautification. In order to maintain the urban tree canopy available in
the City of Wilmington, and those properties that directly abut City limits, the General Assembly authorizes and
directs the Department to establish, and maintain a program of tree maintenance and replacement in cooperation with
the Delaware Center for Horticulture and/or Urban Forestry in the Department of Agriculture. It is the intent of the
General Assembly that such program shall be funded exclusively by allocations made from time to time by members
of the General Assembly from their CTF. The Department shall make payments to the center and/or Urban Forestry
in the Department of Agriculture for work accomplished, and appropriately vouchered, from the CTF funds herein
identified.
Section 113. Supplies of Road Materials. 74 Del. Laws, c. 308 § 109 is suspended until such time as the
Department of Transportation shall suggest its re-institution and such suspension has been overridden by an Act of
the General Assembly.
Section 114. Wakefield Drive. The Department shall be prohibited from reopening Wakefield Drive in
Newark through Old Baltimore Pike.
Section 115. Community Transportation Funding Levels. The Department is directed to account for the
Community Transportation Program funds as cash, which shall be equal to the amounts authorized in Appendix A of
this Act. The funds authorized within the Community Transportation Program shall not be subject to deauthorization
or reallocation by the Department under any circumstances.
Section 116. New Development Road Widening. When planning and/or permitting additional road
widening directly related to new residential development, the Department of Transportation, Division of Planning,
shall make every attempt to require the necessary right-of-way land be acquired from the developer owned land.
Section 117. Buck Road. The Department is requested to refrain from issuing any entrance permit,
authorization or approval for use of any entrance way from New Castle County Tax Parcel Number 07-026.00-094
onto Buck Road, until such time as it also certifies by letter to the New Castle County Department of Land Use that
the developer’s proposed entrance design conforms with the Department’s subdivision requirements, pursuant to its
authority under 17 Del. C. § 146 and its related regulations, intended to protect public safety and maintain smooth


traffic flow. The government of New Castle County is also requested to solicit comments from and work with the
residents of surrounding communities, community organizations, and state and local officials to address traffic safety
and other legitimate land use concerns about the proposed development, after the receipt of the Department’s letter.
The design of the entrance on Buck Road for Greenville Center will include a sidewalk from the entrance to the
surrounding Greenville Manor Community on Ardleigh Drive.
Section 118. Routes 141 and 48. The Department is requested to refrain from issuing any permit,
authorization or approval for use of any new, additional, revised or modified entrances for New Castle County Tax
Parcel Numbers 07-032.20-003, 07-032.20-048 through and including 07-032.20-055, 07-032.20-057 and
07-032.30-072 onto or from Route 141 or Route 48, until such time as the Department obtains, reviews, and
comments upon a traffic operations analysis for the area, which among other elements addresses (1) the predicted
levels of service on intersections, roadways, or the Tyler McConnell Bridge affected by the proposed development of
these parcels, and (2) the roadway improvements necessary to accommodate the development of these parcels, based
upon the exploratory development plans submitted to the New Castle County Department of Land Use by the
developer, as required by the County’s Unified Development Code. To the extent that any submission of proposed
development plans is substantially different than the original exploratory development plans submitted to the County,
the Department is further requested to assess the impact of the new submission’s traffic generation upon the local
transportation network. The scope of the assessment shall be at the reasonable discretion of the Department.
Section 119. Red Light Safety Enforcement. (a) The program shall continue to use recognized safety and
accident criteria in determining whether and where to add any new enforcement locations to this program. Prior to
any new locations, the incumbent state senator and representative for the districts in which such locations are
proposed, shall be notified prior to installation.
(b) To assure integrity and propriety, no person involved in the administration or enforcement of this
program shall own any interest or equity in the vendor used by the Department to support the administrative elements
of the program. Any such person with an ownership or equity interest in such vendor must divest from this
ownership or investment no later than 90 days after the effective date of this Act. This restriction applies to anyone
with either direct involvement in administering or enforcing this program and those in any supervisory capacity above
such persons.
Section 120. Chestnut Hill Road Parcel. The provisions of 17 Del. C. § 137 notwithstanding, the
Department is authorized to enter into agreements with other governmental agencies, either directly or in concert with


a private entity, regarding a Department-owned parcel known as NC227, Tax Parcel Number 11-003.30-027, on
terms the Secretary deems appropriate, for purposes of evaluating the costs and benefits of fuel cell technology from
environmental and economic development perspectives, which the General Assembly hereby finds is an appropriate
public purpose.
Section 121. Rehabilitation of Public Streets, Industrial Parks. In order to maintain a safe, attractive,
and efficient network of public streets serving the State’s growing inventory of industrial parks, the Department shall
be authorized to spend sums not exceeding $1,250,000 on the program first established by 78 Del. Laws c. 76, § 123
to address this issue. The Department shall prepare an inventory of all public streets within the State’s industrial
parks. It shall further rank all of these streets in the same manner that it prepares the annual program of roads eligible
for the Paving and Rehabilitation Program authorized elsewhere in this Act. The Secretary shall then distribute this
list to all members of the General Assembly, together with an estimate of the amounts necessary to address those
public streets in this inventory most in need of repair. If a member of the General Assembly elects to allocate funds
from their CTF to repair any of these public streets, the Secretary may draw on this appropriation to match those
individual CTF dollars on the basis of three dollars from this special account for every one dollar allocated by the
member. The Secretary shall notify all members of their intent to make such matching allocations and shall require
any member interested in participating to notify the Department of their interest within 30 days from the date of such
announcement. In the event that the sum of all individual member requests exceeds the amounts authorized by this
section, the Department shall prioritize the industrial park streets to be improved on the basis of the ranking required
by this section, and shall share its decisions with all members of the General Assembly. For purposes of preparing
this inventory and ranking, the Department is authorized and directed to expend such sums as may be necessary from
the accounts established for statewide paving and rehabilitation activities. For purposes of eligibility, the industrial
park public streets shall be limited to those streets which meet department standards and are currently maintained by
the Department.
Section 122. Community Transportation Fund. The Department will provide an annual financial report
regarding projects funded through CTF and will report to the Co-Chairs of the Joint Committee on Capital
Improvements by June 30 of each fiscal year.
Section 123. Route 1 Widening. The Department is encouraged to consider all feasible and prudent
options with respect to access issues for the proposed widening of State Route 1 between State Route 273 and the


Senator William V. Roth Bridge, including, but not limited to, the provision of new ramps in the vicinity of Newtown
Road.
Section 124. Community Transportation Fund. The Department shall continue to allow the funding of
state historical markers through the CTF. Said CTF-funded markers shall be placed either within the right-of-way, or
as close thereto as safety conditions will permit and shall be positioned to be as visible as possible from the roadway
consistent with applicable highway safety standards. State historical markers, regardless of placement, shall be
exempt from all county or local signage regulations, ordinances, fees or licenses. Existing historical markers shall be
brought into compliance with current standards only as they require replacement, in which case CTF funding may be
used for said replacement and, if necessary, repositioning consistent with current safety standards. If a marker must
be relocated or replaced as the result of a transportation road project, the cost of said relocation or replacement, as
well as the cost of upgrading of the marker to current safety standards shall be borne by the Department as an expense
of the project.
Section 125. Research Programs. Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes various appropriations to the
Department.
(a) Of this amount, the Department shall fund a minimum amount of $250,000 for the purposes of funding
research programs.
(b) Of this amount, $62,500 shall be used for infrastructure research and forums through the University of
Delaware, Institute for Public Administration. An additional $50,000 shall be allocated for the purposes set forth in
this section to be funded from eligible federal funds. These activities funded by this appropriation shall be approved
by the Secretary.
Section 126. Construction Manager/General Contractor Projects. The U.S. Department of
Transportation is encouraging states to explore procurement alternatives for transportation project delivery, through
its Every Day Counts Initiative, aimed at shortening the time frame required for project completion and reducing
overall project costs, while still providing quality assurance for the results. Therefore, the Department is hereby
authorized to utilize Construction Manager/General Contractor (“CM/GC”) procurement mechanisms, for up to ten
twenty transportation construction projects. “Construction Manager/General Contractor” is a project delivery method
under which an owner selects a General Contractor to provide consultation during the design of the project. After the
project design is completed, the General Contractor may submit a bid to perform the construction work. The owner
evaluates the bid and may decide to award the construction contract to the General Contractor, or advertise the


construction contract to be bid. CM/GC entities may be a single firm, a consortium, a joint venture, or a combination
of entities. The use of these experimental procurement approaches is further subject to the following conditions:
(a) The construction contract terms shall include provisions to pay prevailing wage rates as provided in
29 Del. C. § 6960, or the applicable Federal prevailing wage rate, whichever is higher.
(b) The following additional provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69 shall also be incorporated into these contracts:
(1) § 6962(d)(4)a. (anti-pollution, conservation environmental measures); (2) § 6962(d)(7) (equal employment
opportunity assurances); and (3) § 6962(d)(8) (performance bonding requirements).
(c) Any such contracts shall conform to all applicable Federal laws and regulations concerning CM/GC
contracting, without regard to the source of funds.
(d) Any such contracts shall also be subject to the provisions of 17 Del. C. c. 8 (construction payments
held in trust for protection of subcontractors and suppliers).
(e) All other provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69 shall not be applicable to these projects, except as referenced in
this section.
(f) The Co-Chairs of the Joint Committee on Capital Improvements and the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget shall approve all projects subject to this section.
Section 127. Beau Tree Lane. As it has been dedicated for public use by the residents, the section of Beau
Tree Lane located within the jurisdictional limits of the State of Delaware is eligible for the Department of
Transportation’s Snow Removal Reimbursement Program and is specifically exempted from the requirement found in
17 Del. C. § 521(a)(6) requiring that a street be accepted for perpetual maintenance by the Department to qualify for
the Snow Removal Reimbursement Program. The residents of the Delaware section of Beau Tree Lane must comply
with all other requirements of the Snow Removal Reimbursement Program as codified in 17 Del. C. § 521.
Section 128. Community Transportation Funds. Notwithstanding any provision of 29 Del. C. to
the contrary, the Department of Transportation is hereby authorized to use Community Transportation Funds
for a one-time reimbursement to each of the following:
(1) American Legion Department of Delaware in an amount of up to $45,000 for a command
vehicle.
(2) Artesian Water Company in an amount of up to $14,000 for a utility casing pipe related to
Karrington Drive.
(3) Bethel AME Church in an amount of up to $2,500 for a double-sided illuminated sign.


(4) Brandywine School District in an amount of up to $19,700 for a walking path at Maple Lane
Elementary.
(5) Brookstone Maintenance Corporation in an amount of up to $50,000 for playground equipment.
(6) City of Wilmington in an amount of up to $10,000 for Canby Park Improvements.
(7) Friends of Wilmington Parks in an amount of up to $25,650 for a TrackChair and trailer.
(8) Five Points Fire Company in an amount of up to $10,000 for command vehicle equipment.
(9) Holloway Terrace Fire Company in an amount of up to $95,000 for a Chief’s command vehicle.
(10) Leipsic Fire Company in an amount of up to $45,000 for a command vehicle.
(11) New Castle County in an amount of up to $60,000 for Fiscal Year 2026 speed enforcement
cameras at Milltown Road and McKennans Church Road.
(12) ONCOR Coalition, Inc. in an amount of up to $60,000 for playground equipment at Battery Park.
(13) Town of Milton in an amount of up to $120,000 for road resurfacing.
(14) Townsend Fire Company in an amount of up to $30,000 for a brush unit vehicle.
Section 129. Laurel Redevelopment Corporation. Notwithstanding any other provision or law to the
contrary, the Department of Transportation may enter into contractual agreements with the Laurel Redevelopment
Corporation with respect to the use of Community Transportation Funds on those properties owned or managed by
the Corporation. Any use of such funds shall be limited to the support of projects and/or land uses that will be kept
open and available for public access.
Section 130. Bridge 1-424. Being aware that Bridge 1-424 on Old Corbitt Road does not qualify for
FEMA Flood Hazard Mitigation Grants, the General Assembly desires not to vacate Bridge 1-424 or Old Corbitt
Road, New Castle County Road #424.
Section 131. South Market Street Redevelopment. The Delaware Department of Transportation is
authorized to enter into agreements with the City of Wilmington and/or the Riverfront Development Corporation with
respect to the use of Transportation Trust Funds related to the redevelopment of South Market Street in accordance
with the South Market Street Master Plan. Funds shall be expended only with the approval of the Co-Chairs of the
Bond Bill Committee. Funds shall only be utilized for public transportation initiatives related to the redevelopment.
Section 132. Beau Tree Drive. As it has been dedicated for public use by the residents, the section
of Beau Tree Drive located within the jurisdictional limits of the State of Delaware is eligible for minor temporary


road maintenance repairs and expenditures of Community Transportation Funds and is specifically exempted from
the requirement found in 17 Del. C. § 508 regarding the dedication of a new road for state maintenance.
Section 133. Chestnut Ridge. The Department of Transportation shall monitor the progress of the final
completion of roads in the Chestnut Ridge development located in Magnolia.
Section 134. Suburban Streets Paving Management System. Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an
appropriation for Subdivision Street Pavement Management Fund (SSPMF). These funds shall be used by the
Department to accelerate the improvement and the quality of suburban streets by applying these funds toward direct
paving and rehabilitation of suburban streets. The Department will use the formula-based process established under
29 Del. C. § 8419(2) to determine the priority of maintenance and reconstruction projects for suburban streets. The
Department will provide an annual report to the Co-Chairs of the Joint Committee on Capital Improvements on the
progress of the SSPMF. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the SSPMF shall be funded at a minimum level
of $10,000,000 from the Transportation Trust Fund Subject to availability, an annual appropriation of $30,000,000 is
projected to result in an outcome quality metric of 75 percent of suburban street mileage receiving a rating of good
condition by 2036. Additionally, an annual appropriation of $30,000,000 is projected to result in an outcome quality
metric of less than percent of suburban street mileage receiving a rating of poor condition after 2041. The
requirements set forth in 29 Del. C. § 6960 shall not apply to a project wholly funded by the SSPMF.
Section 135. Community Workforce Agreement – Department of Transportation. The Department of
Transportation (the Department) is authorized to engage in a Community Workforce Agreement for no more than two
large public works projects. The projects will be awarded in accordance with 29 Del. C. § 6962. The awarded
contractor for the projects will be required to enter into the Community Workforce Agreement with the Department
and a local labor organization(s). To assist the agency in evaluating the success of the pilot program, the agency shall
establish reporting requirements for the contractor on the projects to be included in the awarded contract.
For Community Workforce Agreement projects, the Community Workforce Agreement shall require the
prime contractor to become party to the Community Workforce Agreement and shall permit them to retain a
percentage of their current workforce. In addition, the Community Workforce Agreement may include a minority
and/or bona fide legal citizens of the State workforce requirement.
The Department of Transportation shall report annually on or before January 1st to the Joint Committee on
Capital Improvement their assessment of the pilot including, but not limited to, employee hiring statistics, cost
savings, project quality, and worker safety.


Section 136. Main Street Newark Electronic Speed Enforcement. The Delaware Department of
Transportation is authorized to enter into an agreement with the City of Newark to allow for the installation of
electronic speed monitoring system devices on Main Street, Newark, a “business district” as defined by 21 Del.
C. §101. The City of Newark shall use the vendor under contract with the Delaware Department of Transportation
for all services and equipment associated with this authorization. Within the Main Street, Newark business district,
the City of Newark shall be permitted to issue violations to any vehicle exceeding the posted speed limit by 6 miles
per hour or more. Civil Speeding violations will be issued pursuant to 21 Del. C. §4170A, which is amended as
specified herein, to allow the use by the City of Newark within the Main Street business district and for violations to
be issued at a lower speed. This authorization for use of electronic speed monitoring systems shall expire after 1
year, unless reauthorized, and under no circumstances shall extend past the sunset date specified in 21 Del. C.
§4170A of June 30, 2028. The City of Newark shall provide the Delaware Department of Transportation with a
quarterly report, including all data requested by the Delaware Department of Transportation, after the systems are
installed which tracks the impacts of the system’s deployment on speeds on Main Street, Newark, business
district. The Delaware Department of Transportation shall include the information received from the City of Newark
in its annual reporting required by 21 Del. C. §4170A(k).
Section 137. McKennans Church Road and Milltown Road Electronic Speed Enforcement. The
Delaware Department of Transportation is authorized to enter into an agreement with New Castle County to
allow for the installation of electronic speed monitoring system devices on McKennans Church Road and
Milltown Road. New Castle County shall use the vendor under contract with the Delaware Department of
Transportation for all services and equipment associated with this authorization. New Castle County shall be
permitted to issue violations to any vehicle exceeding the posted speed limit by 6 miles per hour or more for
these two locations. Civil Speeding violations will be issued pursuant to 21 Del. C. §4170A, which is
amended as specified herein, to allow for violations to be issued at a lower speed. This authorization for use of
electronic speed monitoring systems shall expire after 1 year, unless reauthorized, and under no circumstances
shall extend past the sunset date specified in 21 Del. C. §4170A of June 30, 2028. New Castle County shall
provide the Delaware Department of Transportation with a quarterly report, including all data requested by the
Delaware Department of Transportation, after the systems are installed which tracks the impacts of the
system’s deployment on speeds at both locations. The Delaware Department of Transportation shall include
the information received from New Castle County in its annual reporting required by 21 Del. C. §4170A(k).


Section 138. Red Clay Consolidated School District. Notwithstanding provisions of 21 Del. C.
§4166 to the contrary, Red Clay Consolidated School District school buses equipped with and operating stop-
arm cameras, shall not be required to activate amber warning lamps for 10 seconds prior to the red stop lamps
to give motorists advance notice that the bus is preparing to stop or has stopped to pick up and discharge
pupils.


DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
Section 139. Family Leave Actuarial Study. The Department of Labor shall conduct an actuarial study on
the impact and potential rate changes associated with changing the Paid Family Medical Leave application period
from 24 months to 12 months. The study shall be submitted to the General Assembly no later than April 1, 2026.


DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Section 140. Farmland Preservation. For the current fiscal year $3,000,000 of the $10,000,000 allocated
for Farmland Preservation Funding may be utilized by the Agricultural Lands Preservation Foundation in accordance
with the rules and policies for the Delaware Young Farmer Program in accordance with 3 Del. C. c. 9. An additional
$1,000,000 of the $10,000,000 allocated for Farmland Preservation Funding may be utilized by the Agricultural
Lands Preservation Foundation in accordance with the rules and policies for the Delaware Forestland Preservation
Program in accordance with 3 Del. C. c. 9. All remaining state-appropriated funds shall be utilized by the
Agricultural Lands Preservation Foundation to preserve eligible farms statewide through the traditional farmland
preservation program at its discretion in accordance with Agricultural Lands Foundation rules and policies. Local
jurisdiction funds committed to farmland preservation for the current fiscal year shall be spent to preserve farmland
only in the respective jurisdictions where the funds originate. Farms to be preserved shall be selected by the local
jurisdictions according to the jurisdiction’s selection criteria from eligible farms as listed by the Agricultural Lands
Preservation Foundation. Similarly, any funds provided by nongovernment organizations shall be spent according to
their selection criteria from eligible farms as listed by the Agricultural Lands Preservation Foundation.
Section 141. Farmland Preservation Report. The Department of Agriculture and the Agricultural Lands
Preservation Foundation shall provide a report to the Joint Committee on Capital Improvements. The report shall
review the current farmland preservation program and make suggestions on the property value variations throughout
the State and how those variations are affecting the Agricultural Lands Preservation program. Based on the findings,
the foundation shall make recommendations on program changes to the committee that will address these issues.
Section 142. Cover Crop Investment. Section 1 Addendum of this act makes an appropriation to the
Department of Agriculture for Cover Crop Investment. Of this appropriation up to $400,000 may be allocated to the
Delaware Nutrient Management Commission to fund alternative projects that seek to improve cover crop innovation,
implementation, and accessibility throughout the state. The remaining balance of the appropriation shall be divided
among the three conservation districts based on a formula agreed to by the Department and districts and administered
as part of their respective cost share programs for cover crops. The conservation districts are hereby authorized to use
an amount not to exceed 10 percent of the entire appropriation for direct and indirect expenses associated with
administering the cover crop program.


FIRE PREVENTION COMMISSION
Section 143. Rescue Tools Replacement. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the funds authorized
in the Section 1 Addendum of this Act be used to reimburse the Delaware State Fire School and the Felton, Ellendale,
and Laurel Belvedere, Christiana, Farmington, Five Points, Frankford, Goodwill, Greenwood, Gumboro, Laurel,
Leipsic, Little Creek, Magnolia, Marydel, Newark, Port Penn, Roxana, Slaughter Beach (Memorial), and Wilmington
Manor fire companies. Upon submitting the receipt of sale, each company will be reimbursed up to $7,500 by the
Fire Prevention Commission, State Fire School (75-02-01).


UNIVERSITY OF DELAWARE
Section 144. Biden Hall. (a) Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an appropriation to the
University of Delaware for Deferred Maintenance/Campus Improvements. Of this amount, $20,000,000 shall
be used toward the design and construction of Biden Hall.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the construction of Biden Hall shall be completed
pursuant to a Project Labor Agreement (PLA)/Community Workforce Agreement (CWA). The PLA/CWA shall be
negotiated between the University of Delaware and the Delaware Building and Construction Trades Council and
executed in accordance with all applicable federal and state laws and shall include provisions to ensure the use of
skilled labor, promote workforce diversity, support registered apprenticeship programs, and ensure timely
completion.
Section 145. University of Delaware. Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an appropriation to the
University of Delaware for Deferred Maintenance/Campus Improvements. Of this amount, $600,000 shall be
reallocated to the City of Newark to support pedestrian safety improvements on Main Street.


DELAWARE STATE UNIVERSITY
Section 146. Convocation Center. The Joint Committee on Capital Improvements accepts the Delaware
Convocation Center Feasibility Study final report and recognizes the need for such a facility at Delaware State
University and in Central Delaware. The Committee will work towards exploring options for funding the building of
the facility in future fiscal years. In support of the continued development of the Convocation Center, Delaware State
University shall work with stakeholders comprised of local healthcare leaders in the planning of a Health Institute to
be incorporated within the Convocation Center.
Section 147. Indoor Field House. (a) Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an appropriation to
Delaware State University for Campus Improvements/Deferred Maintenance. Of this amount, $20,000,000
shall be used toward design and construction of an indoor field house athletic facility.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the construction of the indoor field house athletic
facility shall be completed pursuant to a Project Labor Agreement (PLA)/Community Workforce Agreement (CWA).
The PLA/CWA shall be negotiated between the Delaware State University and the Delaware Building and
Construction Trades Council and executed in accordance with all applicable federal and state laws and shall include
provisions to ensure the use of skilled labor, promote workforce diversity, support registered apprenticeship
programs, and ensure timely completion.


DELAWARE TECHNICAL COMMUNITY COLLEGE
Section 148. Critical Capital Needs/Deferred Maintenance. Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an
appropriation to Delaware Technical Community College for Critical Capital Needs/Deferred Maintenance. This
appropriation may be used for the acquisition of computer hardware and software.
Section 149. Critical Capital Needs/Deferred Maintenance. (a) The Section 1 Addendum to this
Act appropriates $30,000,000 to Delaware Technical Community College for its Critical Capital
Needs/Deferred Maintenance program. This appropriation is intended to continue to progress towards
completing learning commons projects, similar to recently completed learning commons projects at the Dover
and Wilmington campuses, at the D-Wing of the Stanton campus and the Betze Library at the Georgetown
campus. Both projects will address deferred maintenance in buildings that are over 40 and 50 years old,
respectively, without significant renovation since their original construction. Major capital improvements will
include exterior shell improvements to prevent future water damage; upgrading mechanical, HVAC, electrical
and plumbing systems; upgrading technology to improve the student learning experience; and, specific to the
D-Wing, expanding the Wellness Center that supports students, faculty and staff inclusive of replacing the
gymnasium floor and bleachers supporting men's and women's basketball, women's volleyball and summer
youth camps. In addition, should the College find a suitable location to reinstitute the College's dental hygiene
program for Kent and Sussex counties, this appropriation may be used to support interior fit-out and/or other
capital improvements, including the purchase of equipment, for dental hygiene.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Stanton Campus Learning Commons Project
shall be completed pursuant to a Project Labor Agreement (PLA)/Community Workforce Agreement (CWA). The
PLA/CWA shall be negotiated between Delaware Technical Community College and the Delaware Building and
Construction Trades Council and executed in accordance with all applicable federal and state laws and shall include
provisions to ensure the use of skilled labor, promote workforce diversity, support registered apprenticeship
programs, and ensure timely completion.


DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Section 150. School Building and Custodial Verification. By October 30 of each calendar year, each
school district shall notify the Department of Education (Department) of its intended use for each school building and
administrative office building. School districts shall notify the Department about changes in the use of such buildings
to include the sale of property, closing of a building, lease of property to another agency and additions and
renovations. The Department shall establish a standard reporting mechanism that school districts shall utilize to
gather and submit required information.
By February 1 of each calendar year, the Department shall verify and reissue custodial allocations to
each school district based on the information obtained annually.
Section 151. Land Donation for School Construction. Any land donated to a school district with an
approved major capital improvement program shall be required to return to the State one-half of the state share
amount originally budgeted for land purchase costs. In such case, the district shall be entitled to keep the remaining
one-half state share amount, as well as the full local share amount in accordance with the certificate of necessity.
Section 152. Minor Capital Improvements. It is the intent of the General Assembly that funds authorized
in the Section 1 Addendum of this Act be used for minor capital improvements to school buildings in the following
amounts:
Maximum Maximum
School District State Share Local Share Total Cost
Appoquinimink $1,469,171 $979,447 $2,448,618
Brandywine 1,143,786 762,524 1,906,310
Special 51,450 51,450
Caesar Rodney 859,145 572,763 1,431,908
Special 47,856 47,856
Cape Henlopen 697,529 465,019 1,162,548
Special 83,417 83,417
Capital 712,057 474,705 1,186,762
Special 51,639 51,639
Christina 1,439,323 959,549 2,398,872
Special 110,088 110,088
Colonial 986,484 657,656 1,644,140
Special 16,267 16,267
Delmar 164,679 109,786 274,465


Indian River 1,188,275 792,183 1,980,458
Special 59,773 59,773
Lake Forest 417,542 278,361 695,903
Laurel 287,025 191,350 478,375
Milford 521,502 347,668 869,170
New Castle County VoTech 912,486 912,486
Polytech 231,716 231,716
Red Clay 1,637,368 1,091,579 2,728,947
Special 22,510 22,510
Seaford 397,000 264,667 661,667
Smyrna 682,095 454,730 1,136,825
Sussex County Technical 250,253 250,253
Woodbridge 284,641 189,761 474,402
Academia Antonia Alonso 152,270 152,270
Academy of Dover Charter 78,500 78,500
Campus Community 76,230 76,230
Charter School of Wilmington 183,670 183,670
Delaware Military Academy 107,251 107,251
Early College High School
at Delaware State University 100,820 100,820
East Side Charter 84,363 84,363
Charter School of New Castle 144,515 144,515
First State Military Academy 78,689 78,689
First State Montessori Academy 121,627 121,627
Freire Charter School 77,743 77,743
Gateway Charter School 36,129 36,129
Great Oaks Charter School 27,428 27,428
Kuumba Academy Charter 113,304 113,304
Las Americas ASPIRA Academy 273,141 273,141
M.O.T Charter 264,061 264,061


Newark Charter 576,357 576,357
Odyssey Charter 414,629 414,629
Positive Outcomes Charter 23,079 23,079
Providence Creek
Academy Charter 140,164 140,164
Sussex Academy of Arts
and Sciences 219,042 219,042
Sussex Montessori 83,039 83,039
Thomas A. Edison Charter 113,872 113,872
Total to Schools $18,215,000 $8,591,748 $26,806,748
Vocational Equipment 85,000 56,667 141,667
TOTAL $18,300,000 $8,648,415 $26,948,415
Maximum Maximum
School District State Share Local Share Total Cost
Appoquinimink $1,191,998 $794,665 $1,986,663
Brandywine 927,202 618,135 1,545,337
Special 48,831 48,831
Caesar Rodney 692,167 461,445 1,153,612
Special 64,235 64,235
Cape Henlopen 574,418 382,945 957,363
Special 67,624 67,624
Capital 574,603 383,069 957,672
Special 42,207 42,207
Christina 1,167,783 778,522 1,946,305
Special 81,179 81,179
Colonial 783,759 522,506 1,306,265
Special 14,634 14,634
Delmar 133,553 89,035 222,588
Indian River 962,416 641,611 1,604,027
Special 52,374 52,374
Lake Forest 344,466 229,644 574,110
Laurel 235,128 156,752 391,880
Milford 418,036 278,691 696,727
New Castle County VoTech 747,560 747,560


Polytech 189,162 189,162
Red Clay 1,323,980 882,653 2,206,633
Special 18,331 18,331
Seaford 338,736 225,824 564,560
Smyrna 544,103 362,735 906,838
Sussex County Technical 206,569 206,569
Woodbridge 238,178 158,785 396,963
Academia Antonia Alonso 140,177 140,177
Academy of Dover Charter 68,240 68,240
Bryan Allen Stevenson
School of Excellence 32,103 32,103
Campus Community 63,003 63,003
Charter School of Wilmington 150,498 150,498
Delaware Military Academy 84,260 84,260
Early College High School
at Delaware State University 89,806 89,806
East Side Charter 66,854 66,854
Charter School of New Castle 121,384 121,384
First State Military Academy 66,700 66,700
First State Montessori Academy 101,205 101,205
Freire Charter School 62,541 62,541
Gateway Charter School 32,503 32,503
Great Oaks Charter School 22,952 22,952
Kuumba Academy Charter 91,500 91,500
Las Americas ASPIRA Academy 226,594 226,594
M.O.T Charter 216,735 216,735
Newark Charter 478,913 478,913
Odyssey Charter 352,137 352,137
Positive Outcomes Charter 18,331 18,331
Providence Creek
Academy Charter 118,457 118,457


Sussex Academy of Arts
and Sciences 182,076 182,076
Sussex Montessori 58,998 58,998
Thomas A. Edison Charter 85,801 85,801
Total to Schools $14,915,000 $6,967,017 $21,882,017
Vocational Equipment 85,000 56,667 141,667
TOTAL $15,000,000 $7,023,684 $22,023,684
Section 153. Dickinson High School. Funding provided to the Red Clay School District for Equalization as
provided for in the Fiscal Year 2025 2026 Annual Appropriations Act shall be contingent upon the following:
(a) The lighted football field at Dickinson High School may be used at night only for Dickinson home games
and Dickinson band practice; and
(b) The district is required to maintain the fencing between Dickinson High School and the community of
Montclare, keep the gate between the properties locked at all times (except by mutual agreement between the district
and the Montclare Civic Association), and provide, maintain and replace, if necessary, the Leland Cypress trees along
the fence line bordering the homes on Salem Drive.
Section 154. School Construction Fund Transfers. Notwithstanding any law or other provision to the
contrary, the Department, with the approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the
Controller General, may transfer funding between major capital construction projects within the respective school
districts. These transfers shall not authorize any changes in conditions or incur any obligations in excess of the
approved Certificate(s) of Necessity.
Section 155. School District Financial Reviews. It is the intent of the General Assembly that, for school
districts receiving funds appropriated in the Section 1 Addendum of this Act, should a school district financial
position report as required under 14 Del. C. § 1507 demonstrate less than one month of carryover, or if at any time
during the course of the fiscal year a school district is projected to not be able to satisfy its local payroll obligations,
the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, in coordination with the Secretary of Education and the
Controller General, is authorized to conduct a comprehensive review of the school district’s capital construction
program.
Section 156. School Construction Contractual Documents. Effective January 1, 2007, all school districts
that receive state funds for major capital construction projects shall use standard bid and contract documents


developed by the Office of Management and Budget, Facilities Management. School districts may enhance the
standard bid and contract documents with additional contractual or project-specific requirements, as long as the
enhancements do not diminish and are not in conflict with the provisions of the standard documents. The
Department, in consultation with the Office of Management and Budget, Facilities Management, shall approve any
modifications or changes to the provisions of the standard bid and contract documents before a school district may
use or enhance the modified documents.
Section 157. City of Wilmington Education Initiatives. (a) The funds appropriated in the Section 1
Addendums of 81 Del. Laws c. 303, 82 Del. Laws c. 86 and c. 244, 83 Del. Laws c. 56, 83 Del. Laws c. 340, and 84
Del. Laws c. 83 for City of Wilmington Education Initiatives, shall be used for the renovation of Bancroft Elementary
School, Bayard Middle School, Stubbs Elementary School, and the construction of a new City of Wilmington
elementary school as part of reconfiguring and consolidating City of Wilmington schools in the Christina School
District. Funding shall be allocated pending both a plan from the district for sufficient use of these capital funds, and
agreement from the Secretary of Education that the district is meeting the objectives set in the Memorandum of
Understanding (MOU), and sufficiently working with the parties of the MOU to support students, families, and
educators. The Secretary of Education, upon approval from the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and
the Controller General, may use a portion of said funding for a district-wide operational, capital and/or program
assessment of the Christina School District, to be submitted to the Governor and the General Assembly. The Secretary
of Education shall certify the overall renovation costs in which any remaining balances may be used to support
subsection (b) of this section. Notwithstanding the provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 75, the maximum local share for the
renovations shall be 20 percent of the full cost of the renovations. The Christina School District may elect, subject to
the approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General, to exercise its local
share of the renovation projects through the withholding of state funding earned through 14 Del. C. and/or the
provisions of the Annual Appropriations Act, for a period to be determined by the Christina School District, the
Director of the Office of Management and Budget, and the Controller General.
(b) The Section 1 Addendum of 83 Del. Laws c.56 appropriated $65,000,000 to the Office of Management
and Budget (10-02-11) for City of Wilmington Education Initiatives. These funds shall be used to build a new school
on the East Side of Wilmington and to build out swing space at Pulaski Elementary School. The funds shall only be
spent upon approval by the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
(c) The Section 1 Addendum of 83 Del. Laws c. 340 appropriated $11,500,000 to the Office of Management


and Budget (10-02-11) for City of Wilmington Education Initiatives. These funds shall be used to build a new school
on the East Side of Wilmington. The funds shall only be spent upon approval by the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget and the Controller General.
(d) The Section 1 Addendum of 84 Del. Laws c. appropriated $12,666,401 to the Office of Management and
Budget (10-02-11) for City of Wilmington Education Initiatives. Of this amount, $9,666,401 shall be used to complete
the new school on the East Side of Wilmington. The funds shall only be spent upon approval by the Director of the
Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General.
Section 158. Appoquinimink School District. Notwithstanding any provision of 14 Del. C. § 1057 or any
other provision of Delaware law to the contrary, the Appoquinimink School District is authorized and empowered to
take all necessary actions to enter into a public-private initiative with a third-party for the design, construction,
operation, maintenance, and repair of an aquatics complex on a portion of the District’s Fairfield Campus, including
the granting a long-term ground lease to the third-party for a portion of the Fairfield Campus, under terms and
conditions satisfactory to the District, such third-party to be chosen by the District in its discretion after reviewing
and evaluating the responses to a publicly-noticed Request For Proposal soliciting responses. Such an aquatics
complex shall be made available to the District for its use in connection with the District’s aquatics programs at such
times and upon such terms and conditions as provided in an agreement between the District and the third-party
chosen by the District in its discretion.
Section 159. Voluntary School Assessments. Notwithstanding the provisions of 9 Del. C. § 2661, and 9
Del. C. § 6961, or any other state law to the contrary, upon receipt of an expenditure plan approved by the local
school board, the Co-Chairs of the Joint Committee on Capital Improvements, the Director of the Office of
Management and Budget, and the Controller General, the Department of Education is authorized to distribute the
balance of funds collected in the Voluntary School Assessment accounts for each respective school district, to be
used for minor capital improvements to school buildings in each respective district. Such funds shall not be used to
supplant existing state or local funds.
Section 160. School District MCI Projects. Notwithstanding any other statutory provision to the contrary,
local school districts may request a waiver of the standard minor capital threshold to complete projects funded by
solar grants funded by the Sustainable Energy Utility. For the purposes of this section, these projects shall be
designated as Minor Capital Improvement projects under 14 DE Admin. Code § 405 and exempt from requirements
of 14 Del. C. § 2306 and 14 DE Admin. Code § 401. Project waiver requests must be individually submitted to the


Department of Education for approval by the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, Controller General
and Secretary of Education.
Section 161. School Safety and Security. (a) Section 1 Addendum of this Act makes an appropriation to
the Department of Education for the Delaware School Safety and Security Fund. Of this amount, the Department
shall provide a minimum amount of $138,000 to the Department of Safety and Homeland Security, Delaware
Emergency Management Agency, for school mapping, reporting application, and threat assessment tools. Of this
amount, the Department shall further provide up to $160,000 to the Department of Safety and Homeland Security,
Delaware State Police, State Bureau of Identification, for the Real-Time Crime Center application to enhance safety
in and around schools.
(b) For a Local Education Agency (LEA) to qualify for the School Safety and Security Fund, any constables
employed by the LEA and assigned to schools must have successfully completed a nationally recognized course in
school-based security/policing that covers topics such as adolescent mental health, de-escalation techniques, trauma-
informed practices, and supporting students with special needs. The Delaware Emergency Management Agency
(DEMA) will host the required course annually at no cost to LEAs. Additionally, constables must participate in
annual training facilitated by the Department of Education and the Delaware Emergency Management Agency
(DEMA). LEAs must provide the Delaware School Safety Center (through DEMA) with an up-to-date list of all
employed constables assigned to schools. This list must be updated annually and upon any personnel changes. Failure
to meet either requirement will render the LEA ineligible for funding under this program.
Section 162. New Castle County Vo-Tech. Upon completion of a feasibility study of a new Howard High
School Athletic Field, it is the intent of the General Assembly to ensure funding is allocated toward construction of
the new athletic field.
Section 163. Water Bottle Refilling Stations. All newly constructed public-school buildings and
public-school buildings undergoing additions or major building renovations shall be equipped with water bottle
filling stations. Water bottle filling station means a water dispenser accessible to all people in compliance with the
Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.) that dispenses clean drinking water directly into a
bottle or other drinking container. Water bottle filling stations may be integrated into drinking fountains and shall
dispense cooled and filtered drinking water. Schools are encouraged to install touchless bottle filling stations for
sanitary reasons.


The Department of Education shall not approve the plans and specifications for a new public-school
building or for any addition or major building renovation of an existing public-school building unless the plans and
specifications provide for the following:
(a) A minimum of one (1) water bottle filling station per two hundred (200) people projected to occupy
the building upon completion of the proposed construction or major renovation.
(b) A minimum of one (1) water bottle filling station on each floor and wing of each school building.
(c) A minimum of one (1) water bottle filling station in all school food service areas.
(d) A minimum of one (1) water bottle filling station located in or near gymnasiums, outdoor recreation
spaces, and other high-traffic areas.
Section 164. School Construction Project Allowable Square Footage. The square footage of school
construction projects approved with a Certification of Necessity (CN) may not increase more than one percent of
total square footage as stated in the approved CN. Any increase over one percent of total square footage shall be
supported with local funds. The state share of the project shall be based on the square footage and funding split
established at the time of issuance of the CN, plus no more than a one percent increase.
Section 165. School Construction Market Pressure. Market pressure will not be allocated for projects
with a Certificate of Necessity (CN) approved in November 2023, or thereafter, for construction and/or renovation of
any public education facility. It is the responsibility of the school district to utilize local funding or adjust project
scope to account for increased costs during design, bid, or other phases of the project.
Section 166. HVAC School Energy Audit. All newly constructed public-school buildings and public-
school buildings undergoing upgrades to school HVAC systems shall be required to perform an energy audit through
the Delaware Sustainable Energy Utility.
Section 167. Capital School District. Notwithstanding any provision of Delaware Code to the contrary, the
Capital School District is authorized to use the remaining funds associated with CN # 2013A (new dual 800 Student
Middle School), CN #2013B, to fund the renovation/conversion of Central Middle School to Central Elementary
School CN # 2013B.2.
Section 168. POLYTECH School District Property Title. At the time of its creation, the POLYTECH
School District was named Kent County Vocational Technical School District. Since 1991, it has been referred to as
“POLYTECH School District.” All rights, title, and interests of the Kent County Vocational Technical School
District, including any real property and the property situated at 823 Walnut Shade, Woodside, DE 19980 (parcel


number 7-00-11100-01-2900-000), are vested in the Board of Education of the POLYTECH School District.
Section 169. William Henry Middle School Projects. Notwithstanding any provision of Delaware Code or
regulations to the contrary, and with the concurrence of the school board, the Capital School District is authorized to
use funds appropriated for Certificate of Necessity (CN) # 2113A for the design, renovations, and additions to the
former William Henry Middle School to support new facilities for the Kent County Community School and Kent
County Secondary ILC. The Capital School District shall submit a request for a new CN to the Department of
Education for the Renovations and Additions to William Henry Middle School. The new CN shall accurately reflect
the new scope and cost of the project. The Department of Education may approve this CN if adequate funds are
available.
Section 170. Certificate of Necessity Evaluation. The Department of Education, in collaboration
with the Office of Management and Budget and the Office of the Controller General, shall develop and submit
to the Co-Chairs of the Joint Committee on Capital Improvement, by December 1, 2025, a revised framework
for the prioritization of school capital projects (including issuance of Certificates of Necessity (CNs) and
capital improvement plan budget submissions). The revised framework shall:
(a) Identify strategies to increase the total number of capital projects undertaken within existing
budgetary constraints.
(b) Provide alternative methods for evaluating and prioritizing projects that balance student capacity
needs with critical renovation, modernization, and health and safety improvements; and
(c) Ensure that renovation and deferred maintenance projects are not systematically deprioritized
solely due to capacity growth metrics.
Section 171. Enhanced Minor Capital Improvements. (a) The Section 1 Addendum of this Act
appropriates $12,000,000 $15,000,000 to the Department of Education for Enhanced Minor Capital
Improvements (MCI). Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, these funds shall be used to
address minor capital improvement projects in school buildings and facilities statewide. This amount shall be
paid by the Department of Education to local districts in the following amounts:
School District Allocation
Appoquinimink $1,096,120
Brandywine 876,388
Caesar Rodney 662,414


Cape Henlopen 557,756
Capital 554,369
Christina 1,123,132
Colonial 743,279
Delmar 122,864
Indian River 913,307
Lake Forest 311,520
Laurel 214,144
Milford 389,083
New Castle County VoTech 408,473
Polytech 103,727
Red Clay 1,231,684
Seaford 296,194
Smyrna 508,898
Sussex County Technical 112,025
Woodbridge 212,366
Academia Antonia Alonso 68,164
Academy of Dover Charter 35,140
Campus Community 34,124
Charter School of Wilmington 82,220
Delaware Military Academy 48,011
Early College High School at Delaware State University 45,132
East Side Charter 37,765
Charter School of New Castle 64,692
First State Military Academy 35,225
First State Montessori Academy 54,446
Freire Charter School 34,802
Gateway Charter School 16,173
Great Oaks Charter School 12,278


Kuumba Academy Charter 50,720
Las Americas ASPIRA Academy 122,271
M.O.T Charter 118,207
Newark Charter 258,005
Odyssey Charter 185,608
Positive Outcomes Charter 10,330
Providence Creek Academy Charter 62,744
Sussex Academy of Arts and Sciences 98,054
Sussex Montessori 37,172
Thomas A. Edison Charter 50,974
Total to Schools $12,000,000
School District/Charter Allocation
Appoquinimink $1,361,851
Brandywine 1,092,796
Caesar Rodney 834,829
Cape Henlopen 702,625
Capital 685,413
Christina 1,389,833
Colonial 905,472
Delmar 152,584
Indian River 1,135,457
Lake Forest 393,550
Laurel 268,632
Milford 477,603
New Castle County Vo-Tech 512,450
Polytech 129,670
Red Clay 1,525,204
Seaford 387,004
Smyrna 621,634
Sussex Tech 141,602
Woodbridge 272,118


Academia Antonia Alonso 96,091
Academy of Dover 46,778
Bryan Allen Stevenson School of Excellence 21,964
Campus Community 43,188
Charter School of Wilmington 103,166
Delaware Military Academy 57,760
Early College High School at Delaware State University 61,562
East Side Charter 45,828
Charter School of New Castle 83,208
First State Military Academy 45,722
First State Montessori 69,376
Freire Charter School 42,871
Gateway Charter 22,280
Great Oaks Charter School 15,734
Kuumba Academy 62,723
Las Aspira Academy 155,329
M.O.T Charter 148,571
Newark Charter 328,293
Odyssey Charter School 241,389
Positive Outcomes 12,566
Providence Creek 81,202
Sussex Academy of Arts and Science 124,813
Sussex Montessori 40,443
Thomas A. Edison Charter 58,816
Total to Schools $15,000,000

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, funds appropriated in this section shall not be
subject to the $1,000,000 minor capital improvement restriction and local matching funds are not required.
(c) Each school district and charter school shall submit a report of capital improvements projects
planned for expenditure of these funds to the Department of Education, the Office of Management and Budget,
and the Controller General’s Office by January 1, 2025 2026.


(d) Notwithstanding any provision or law to the contrary, effective July 1, 2024 2025, reorganized
school districts shall be authorized to assess a local match to provide up to a 60/40 state/local share for the
Enhanced Minor Capital Improvements state amounts appropriated in subsection (a) of this section. This
match is optional and must be used for the same purposes as state funds appropriated for Enhanced Minor
Capital Improvements. A partial local match is authorized, provided the local share does not exceed 40
percent. A district may assess a match not to exceed a 60/40 state/local share all in one fiscal year or over
multiple fiscal years. The match may only be provided through the original end date of the Enhanced Minor
Capital Improvements appropriation and any continuations thereof.
Section 172. Red Clay Consolidated School District. The acquisition and use of New Castle County
parcel 10-018.00-007 as school bus storage by the New Castle County Vocational Technical School District
and/or the Red Clay Consolidated School District shall not be subject to New Castle County permits and/or
approvals, State of Delaware permits and/or approvals, and 29 Del. C. §7525 to the extent such
permits/approvals have not been issued by October 1, 2025.
Section 173. Red Clay Consolidated School District. The Section 1 Addendum of this Act includes
an appropriation of $600,000 for the Red Clay School District for a transportation maintenance facility.
Notwithstanding any provisions of the Delaware Code to the contrary, Red Clay School District is authorized
to assess a local match to provide a 60/40 state/local share as required for this project.
Section 174. Bond Verification. All bonds issued, or herein before or herein authorized to be issued, by
the State are hereby determined to be within all debt and authorization limits of the State.
Section 175. Inconsistency. Insofar as the provisions of this Act are inconsistent with the provisions of any
general, special or local laws, or parts thereof, the provisions of this Act shall be controlling.
Section 176. Severability. If any section, part, phrase or provision of this Act or the application thereof be
held invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, such judgment shall be confined in its operation to the section,
part, phrase, provision or application directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment shall have been
rendered and shall not affect or impair the validity of the remainder of this Act or the application thereof.
Section 177. Effective Date. This Act shall take effect in accordance with the provisions of state law.